1. Place all ingredients into a disposable roasting pan and put either over the fire or onto the bbq and allow to slowly simmer for 1.5-2 hours, or until cooking liquid is syrupy turning the chicken occasionally in the liquid.
Favorite Movie: Becoming Jane. Yes, I said it, "Becoming Jane" is by far one of my all time faves. I love me some James McAvoy!
There needs to be a period of training and development. Get their feet wet. We can actively recruit people
Testing should start at six months for children at risk for lead poisoning. Based on these test results and a child’s risk factors, the doctor will then decide whether further testing is needed and how often. In some states, more frequent testing is required by law.
Zishe the Strong Man by Robert Rubenstein with illustrations by Woody Miller
Cancer is progressive, so is syphilis, woodworm, dry rot and dementia, and all of them bring friendlier changes than have the “progressive” politicians and reformers of our age.
Shame on my drawers. People think this is my allocated "Junk Drawer." No, friends, no. I have another entire Asshole Junk Drawer dedicated to other things. Paperclips. Rubber Bands. Penis Drinking Straws from my Bachelorette Party.
Reply 4
Let me start with Governor Romney.
Hubs is definitely a grill master!
Toulouse sausage Scotch egg
And since moving back to Brisbane, I haven't come across another one.
"Miami has always set the weirdness bar, but Serge Storms is back in action and ready to pole vault over it.
G&M: Yes
(6) packages of Ball Park franks
A contest that is so close that it is impossible to predict the winner; a race in which two or more contestants finish at the same time.
4. If you don’t want intrigues and issues, behave accordingly. If you don’t want to ruin your name or spoil your summer, be careful of bringing yourself to the public especially that you are celebrities.
blots out light's love.
There was a Reverse Bid on AW, it was for one girl to be gangbanged, bareback by 6 guys. Must include anal and watersports.
Rather pointless really.
April 13, 20—
Abera means “light”. Abera desires to go as a missionary to Iran or Iraq. He said, “I want to reach Shia Muslims. They are hard. Sunni’s are easy.” Pray God opens the door for Abera to be a “light” in these hard countries.
The morning we were going Dan ended up having to go to leeds for a blood transfusion.
“I was interested in this because it bore out an opinion of mine that philosophy is an affair of character rather than of logic: the philosopher believes not according to evidence, but according to his own temperament; and his thinking merely serves to make reasonable what his instinct regards as true.”
"I can't take care of myself anymore, let alone take care of you." The old man cleared his throat. He pulled a hankie from his pocket and blew his nose with a mighty blast.
She was mentally clear right up to the end, and she even walked a few steps (with a lot of help) about 5 am on Friday; this was only 2 or 3 hours before her body stopped functioning. It is still believed that the new rare disease was unrelated to the older rare disease. The combination of two unrelated diseases this rare in a single person is extraordinarily unusual.
"I did," he replied, "but the counting sheep didn't work out so well."
Up until this point of knitting , you are essentially creating a long tube, with the number of stitches on your front and back needles being the same (you haven't any need to shape your sock with decreases and increases for this part of the foot...it will fit :) )
People Power! Immortal Technique on 9/11, abuse of power and religion as control The Making of American Foreign Policy “Primordialism” and the decline of human culture House Overwhelmingly Votes to Advance Iran Sanctions the radioactive nature of jewish thinking–transforming the garden of eden into the little shop of horrors If Americans Knew – what every American needs to know about Israel/Palestine Layoff Notices Sent to Thousands of US Teachers
2tsp curry powder
I'll never forget that day
It is hard, but to forgive without being asked is the greatest gift a person can do for their loved one. It heals and improves a relationship when we use the gifts that we have been taught,such as; kindness, compassion, truth and forgiveness.
C&H Save $1/1 2lb Light (5/20)
I have never been one to understand
Helping my son has become complicated and conflict-ridden. This brings us to the condoms. Sometime ago, I bought my son a box of condoms, intending that he would check them out in order to be familiar with them when the time—preferably far, far in the future—came. There were three. He took one to school, put it (wrapped) in a friend’s sandwich and enjoyed the hilarity that ensued.
I found it kind of hard just to get used to holding them to be honest, but felt that I picked it up relatively fast. Just need to polish everything! I've got the first two thirds of the dance down, just gotta get the last minute sorted.
I hate hypothetical questions, but I'm pretty sure I wouldn't be interested in doing a reality TV show. That said, I don't think it's wrong that John and Kate do it. This works for their family. Think of all the opportunities that have come their way because of it. They've been able to do things they would never have done otherwise. I'm sure there are those out there who disagree, but you just can't say what you'd do until you've walked a mile in someone else's shoes. It's easy to say you'd never do a TV show, but when faced with raising 8 small children by yourself while your husband works a million hours a week, you might just change your mind.
but I musn’t regret the path I choose
Get to know your garden. If you have dappled shade like I do, even a small plot will have variation in the amount of sunlight it gets. Sometimes moving a vegetable just a couple of feet will pay big dividends. I look for the sunniest patches within my garden to plant vegetables such as squash, beans and tomatoes.
Laurel Habel was the lead researcher in this study. She explains the concerns regarding ADHD drugs. “Because they can increase heart rate and blood pressure in children and adults, there have been concerns about the cardiovascular safety of stimulants and other medications used primarily to treat ADHD,” Habel explained. “Relatively few large safety studies have been conducted, especially in adults. Our findings indicate that these medications do not markedly increase the risk of serious cardiovascular events in young and middle-aged adults.” In November, a study released by the New England Journal of Medicine also found no increased risk from ADHD drugs.
Since assuming the presidency, he has steadily separated us from our Democratic allies and has subordinated us to despotic regimes whose sole objective it is to establish Shariah-compliant Islam as the dominant way of life throughout the world.
And it's kind of funny how you can bring out the mini-M&M's and arms and legs start to move, (though snot and drool and wailing continues).
Even so, I won't leave you without good stuff on the blog since I am still doing the 2011 Slayersword interviews, so stay tuned!
I have so many things I’d love to have a go at, or places I’d love to see and having someone by your side to share these moments with is a wonderful thing.
It is much too soon to jump to conclusions about who and why, although that does not stop it happening of course.
As Kafka says at the top right of this blog, "Writing means revealing oneself to excess." Can't be avoided.
As soon as I realized my eye cream contained mineral oil, I decided to switch. I love Dior products, and was attracted to this eye cream initially by the cream-gel texture. Now this eye cream by Dior is not oil free, but it is free of mineral oil. This formula is rich, but delivers the freshness of a gel. After only a few uses, my dark circles had faded slightly (never had that happen with an eye cream before), and I had no more puff balls under my eyes in the A.M.! Over time, I really saw a decrease in my crow’s feet! My fine lines seem to be a genetic curse, and I have a feeling those are here to stay; but they certainly didn’t get any worse!
Anyway, check out these fine ladies this morning, and please—have a wonderful Easter weekend…
42 Unique Elements , 23 Word strips, 9 Word Arts, 2 x Alpha's.
John is now teaching 5th grade at Diamond Valley. He is also doing his internship for his administrative endorsement, and also is teaching a college course at Dixie State. He's a busy go this year with lots to do, never a minute to relax without something due. He says it will be worth it after this year. The first semester of his internship will be at Diamond Valley and next semester will be at the high school and district office. He's doing great!
11 down
It kind of makes me feel a little sad. Well, not a little sad... a teeny-tiny-bit sad... LOL
Cardamom pods-2,crushed
I flew into Costa Rica on February 10th, 2005. Flying out of Calgary, I had a layover in Houston and was on my way. San Jose left a lot to be desired for me…it was certainly not where the charm of Costa Rica resided. It was however the only city I encountered on my trip there…and the only real sign of infrastructure and development. I wasn’t too much into history back then, so I wasn’t drawn to that aspect of the city, but I think if I were to ever return my experience would be much different.
everything which was left by the Europeans in mines, farms and stores. When Mwari saw the people taking the things of white men, he was angry. The mhondoro talked to Neharida saying, “The people have made a mistake taking the things of the white men which I told them not to take.” Nehanda said to the people, “Mwari has said, you shall
Then there are places where providing good customer service isn't as much of a priority as it is to pour an accurate shot amount. When customer service in general goes by the wayside, you have a little bit more flexibility in how you handle the stiffers. I'm the type of bartender that feels it is important to always provide good customer service. My philosophy? The better the service, the better the tip. It also increases the chances of return business.
But there is a danger in reading too much into this new data. The fact is, thoughtful people in the food policy discussion never said proximity to a store means poor people can or will eat healthy diets. Bornstein correctly points out that many factors enter into a person’s decision about what to eat. Stores in poor neighborhoods often have produce that is less than desirable. Many people don’t know how to prepare fresh produce – especially items with which they are unfamiliar – or don’t have the time or the kitchen equipment to do so.
Explain a person you admire and then tell me what you would do as a mother in order to produce that person from one of your children. What are some people and laws that you would change to make your job easier?
1 Corinthians 13 says 1 If I speak in the tongues of men and of angels, but have not love, I am only a resounding gong or a clanging cymbal. 2 If I have the gift of prophecy and can fathom all mysteries and all knowledge, and if I have a faith that can move mountains, but have not love, I am nothing. 3 If I give all I possess to the poor and surrender my body to the flames, but have not love, I gain nothing. 4 Love is patient, love is kind. It does not envy, it does not boast, it is not proud. 5 It is not rude, it is not self-seeking, it is not easily angered, it keeps no record of wrongs. 6 Love does not delight in evil but rejoices with the truth. 7 It always protects, always trusts, always hopes, always perseveres.
This poem was written by Lieutenant Colonel John McCrae, MD (1872-1918) Canadian Army, after the terrible battle of Ypres salient, Belgium on December 3rd, 1915.
I start whimpering too. I walk out of his room knowing full well he’ll follow me and I don’t care. I crawl back into bed. He sneaks in without opening the door this time. He creeps over to where my water bottle SHOULD be but it’s not there. I lean over the bed, grab him and his twenty thousand blankets and lay him on the other side of our queen size mattress. I stuff a pillow between us and I give him my back.
Less than a week later, he went to check on his wood-working shed in town, and found a large stoneware crock sitting in front of the door.
The first two points relate to two specific cases that reflect collusion between employers and the police: they are the current court case involving GSS News Agency which was taken up by the Malaysian Trades Union Congress (MTUC) with Tenaganita’s support and the failed rescue of suspected survivors of sex trafficking in Seremban.
We also need to revamp the coop and set aside a larger area of the backyard for them to roam, so as to reclaim the rest of the backyard for our use!
I mean, really… Follow me here – Ninety. Seven. Days.
3 truly
1 teaspoon vanilla extract
Nouns and verbs chosen for dialogue directly affect the intensity of tone and the reader's perception of the character. These words can reveal whether the character is dominant or submissive, passionate or dispassionate.
One month left. Five years ago, if someone gave me the chance to spend a month in Paris (or London or San Francisco or many other places for that matter), I think I would have been dazzled by the offer. One whole month. But from this end of my Paris sojourn, one month seems vanishingly short. And those of you who don't like seeing the countdown timer I recently added, how do you think I feel? Am I sad? A little. Weepy? Not yet. Panicky? From time to time. Busy? Definitely.
Many residents interviewed by Reuters disagree with Mitt Romney’s views on immigration. They are proud of their own heritage as industrious immigrant settlers and understand the plight of fellow Mexican citizens who leave to seek a better life in the United States.
buy a box of Ding Dongs & have a pity party with a Dr. Pepper to wash it down.
The world has changed, a lot! But the way young people think and learn I’m not sure about that, are you? If so, why are we discussing Vygostky, Dewey, and the other guys who wrote about how people learn LAST CENTURY?
Later, when we were AT the park, she comes over to me and says, "It is a lovely day indeed."
In the case of Uniloc, Microsoft was found to infringe Uniloc's patent directed to software "product key" technology that helped prevent "casual copying" of software products. The jury awarded Uniloc $388M in damages. The damage award was based on the testimony of Uniloc’s expert, Dr. Gemini. Gemini opined that the damage calculation was based on the value of a product key ($10) multiplied by 25% of the value of the product (Windows XP, Microsoft Word), resulting in a baseline royalty rate of $2.50 per license issued.
I can actually cook a few Mexican dishes .... my enchiladas are delectable and my salsa is excelente!!
ES: You know, I’m not really sure where it came from. It just happened I guess. That’s what everyone’s called me for the last couple of years.
Then, I had a choice. This time, the loss came out of nowhere, completely unexpected, and there is no ease in picking up the pieces and moving on. Being a 47-year-old widower is a whole different universe from being a 35-year-old divorcé.
I'm just not into Easter...
While Martyn has abandoned God altogether, or has completely subverted Christian ideals to his own twisted ends, Blandine is in quest of a new definition of God. Ever since the incomprehensible tragedy of losing her parents and sister in a shipwreck, she no longer finds the idea of God as personal savior compelling. Blandine is a questing soul, searching for a new belief system, while Martyn has
I always remember ‘Kerrang!’ interviews with him back in the 80′s gave the impression he was a prickly character but that is far from the real Dio who got together the Hear ‘N’ Aid project for charity and ran a charity with his wife Wendy Dio to help get children out of prostitution. We have many great songs to remember him by from his days in Rainbow, Black Sabbath and Dio.
“I work as a writer in the Minneapolis public schools,” Mr Kiesel said, “and one day I walked into an upper elementary classroom in which the teacher had told me no writing ever went on. She also warned me about Tony, the troublemaker who sat in the back row. True, he was. He made noises. Interesting noises. One of them sounded like my old hand lawn mower in Los Angeles. I asked him to come up and be my old lawn mower in Los Angeles. He was quite happy about this. Actually, he did it with éclat, mowing up and down the aisles. Other kids volunteered their machinelike noises and we had a fine time. This led easily into talking about machines and imagining ourselves and others as machines. The last twenty minutes I asked them to write down their machine fantasies. This is what Tony wrote: ‘My dad broke down two years ago. First, he lost his hubcaps then he got no brakes. His gas tank started leaking so he run out of gas a lot. Then serious stuff goes on like flat tires and motor conking out. Mom and I revved him up every once in a while. But no good happening. He’s just a piece of junk gone somewhere we don’t know. But I miss him sometimes and I’m going to be a car fixer when I’m eighteen.’”
The Newlywed Kennedys Dine at Their Wedding Reception
So there is my list....hopefully it blesses you in some way to perhaps find a new blogger to read or be reminded of one you need to add to your reader.
They protest in vehement denial, so unabashed about their heritage, their pride, their arrogant patriotism. Sri Lankans, they roar! Yet I wonder what they have done to earn this glory besides hold up a placard, wrapping a flag around their heads and choosing sides in a game they have not even bothered to understand.
Ring appeared over Washington DC — central Pennsylvania — and Tennessee …. watch these as well.. rings are seen in the video— screenshots below:
The shimmering halo
Chuck smiled. “If you don’t run I’ll eat you up.”
“Don’t be ridiculous! Besides, who would know other than Riva that we’re even planning on making a Beboodle? She wants to see the doll you make for Junior. She wouldn’t say that if she planned on stopping us. Right?”
SEC. 2. Pursuant to the provisions of Article VI, section 26, of the Constitution, the President is hereby authorize, during the existence of the emergency, to promulgate such rules and regulations as he may deem necessary to carry out the national policy declared in section 1 hereof. Accordingly, he is, among other things, empowered (a) to transfer the seat of the Government or any of its subdivisions, branches, departments, offices, agencies or instrumentalities; (b) to reorganize the Government of the Commonwealth including the determination of the order of precedence of the heads of the heads of Executive Departments; (c) to create new subdivisions, branches, departments, offices, agencies or instrumentalities of government and to abolish any of those already existing; (d) to continue in force laws and appropriations which would lapse or otherwise become inoperative, and to modify or suspend the operation or application of those of an administrative character; (e) to impose new taxes to increase, reduce, suspend or abolish those in existence; (f) to raise funds through the issuance of bonds or otherwise, and to authorize the expenditure of the proceeds thereof; (g) to authorize the national, provincial, city or municipal governments to incur in overdrafts for purposes that he may approve; (h) to declare the suspension of the collection of credits or the payments of debts; and (i) to exercise such other powers as he may deem necessary to enable the Government to fulfill its responsibilities and to maintain and enforce the authority.
I also try to eat all that’s in there before I do the next round of shopping because there’s no crime worse against nature than to throw away food. So, I try to shop when I’ve slim down the fridge until I can see shelf space again, until I’m down to a quarter a bag of milk, no eggs or one last apple no one wants to eat. The rate determining step though is if I’m down to the two ends of the bread that’s my cue and I need to do groceries.
It wouldn’t be that big a deal except there’s no hint of a discharge date. Not even a whisper of suggestion. In fact with every meeting, such a miraculous thing seems an ever increasingly distant dream.
redistribution/punishing success
I was wondering how the title was going to be collected. Trade collections of recent work tends not to cost significantly less than the monthly issues, and sixteen issues of Fatale works out to $56, probably far too much for impulse purchases.
Invitations...there are some forums that are "by invitation only". I have been invited to a few and some were fine, others were not.
Our next Dr. appointment is this Thursday. I'm excited and of course nervous. I'm just anxious to hear that little heartbeat again. I'm hoping we'll schedule the big ultrasound, as tomorrow I'll be 14 weeks. This is getting exciting. This morning as I was laying on the bed (ignoring the need to actually get OUT of bed) I was feeling my abdomen and I really can tell that the uterus is growing. (I hope that's not too gross). Under my belly button is much more firm. I'm not showing all that much when standing, (hence no pictures) but I'm pretty fired up to see how this pregnancy looks compared to the last.
Written by Clement C. Moore. Illustrated by Tom Newsom. Ages 4-8.This hardcover edition of The Night Before Christmas was given to me last Christmas Eve. It is a unique book which combines the classic poem with beautiful illustrations and secret surprises on each page. There are envelopes to open, cards to unfold and pop-ups all filled with Christmas trivia such as; Santa’s Favorite Recipe, the origins of the original story, ideas for Christmas activities and the legend behind that famous reindeer! This is a book for children and grown-ups. If you love The Night Before Christmas, buy this book. It is simply a treasure.9. My First Kwanzaa Book
It's pouring with rain outside now but I had a lovely morning in town with my little one so I thought I'd pop by and tell you all about it. We went straight from the school drop off into town and she was very good in the pushchair all the way :)
Yesterday (Sunday,March 18)--- Went to church.Still no youth but I have faith that some will come soon. ^^ We had a REALLY good lunch,and me and mom went to the library I got two movies and two mangas,I was looking for music or art books but none seemed to cetch my eye.Then went back and had evening services.Mom and dad were having a VERY long conversation with some people from church afterwords so we staied their almost all night.(till 11pm) During that time kyle and me were outside.He looked for toads and I looked at the stars.
Canada’s approach to protect the world’s largest intact forest has made them a leader in Forest Conservation. They have set an example for other nations to follow.
5.rich life
So. Here’s what I think. I think we should stop letting stupid quarrels divide the body of Christ. I think we should live our lives reverently trying to honor the prayer that Jesus prayed for us on His last night before He died. I think we should look at ourselves (not point fingers at others) and find out if we are projecting an accurate image of Christ to the world — because whether we like it or not, when the world looks for a physical representation of God, we’re what they get. The Church. The body of Christ. Are we a coordinated body that follows its Head, or are we full of spasms and seizures that hurt ourselves and others?
and leave me a separate comment telling me.
I don’t get how this parenting thing works. I don’t get how this marriage thing works. I don’t get how I work. I don’t get how people work and why there are always issues. I don’t get what life is about. I don’t get it about families and how they feel like sticky webs sometimes…like no matter how hard you try you are stuck in the sticky web of the same old same old. I don’t get it about prayer. I don’t get this adoption thing. I DON’T GET IT.
I’ve learned that people fast for several reasons, like repentance, mourning, or preparation. Today, I typed “fasting, repentance” into my search engine, and chose the first related article. The subject matter was disconcerting, but I did gain a better understanding of why people fast in order to repent.
Level 3: MP Cost: 31, jumps for a certain distance.
This is the link to my page-check it out and see if it suits your needs!
26.Bosnia & Herzegovina 5
Also included is a selected scenes commentary by actress Juliette Binoche. She talks about meeting Kieslowski for the first time and how they talked about philosophy. She turned down a role in Jurassic Park (1993) to do Blue. The actress gives her impression of the director and what it was like to work with him.
Olsen J, Rachootin P. Invited commentary: monitoring fecundity over time--if we do it, then let's do it right. Am J Epidemiol. 2003; 157: 94-97.
(see recipe book)
Singaporeans really do love bread huh, and love the name of a Parisian baker, and the novelty of a new bakery haha it was reallyyy crowded ytd and from what I know, today was v crowded too!
Big Rig
The internationally acclaimed Girl with the Dragon Tattoo is not a book that I would generally pick up; crime fiction is not really my thing. But just as with the Da Vinci Code, this was recommended to me by several people, and I was intrigued by the trailer for the Swedish film, so decided to give it a shot.
Chuck the tiny cubes all in the big pan, add the sugar, the sachet of pectin ( don't breathe in, it will make you cough ) the vanilla sugar, and the cinnamon.
I didn't really need her to say what she complained about though as she had been spouting off for two months about real, and not so real problems in the store.
“Welcome to McDonald’s, how may I help you?”
.. In addition each Design Team member for VLVS! Will have $10 to give away to one lucky commenter on their blog, as well as ANOTHER $25 to one lucky commenter on the VLVS! Blog.
Total Cost: $3.89
Firstly, that my firstborn will be leaving the nest, leaving the small school that has not only provided her with an amazing grounding in education, but has also cared for her, supported her, lifted her, fostered her and protected her.
Some velcro strips or dots (self adhesive ones work the best)
Anyways, what better climate for post-hardcore? The year 1992 was the perfect climate for this sort of music and what better place for it to be summoned other than Oakland?!
The Wyndham Sisters
As with all modern versions of history usually presented in large print and bright colours and revelling in the glories of diversity, things are not always as the seem.
from love you have cometh
“You know there will be potatoes, Vedran said. Somehow in all the Partizan movies, people ate potatoes during the war.”
Crowd: Yarr.
Hospitality Room (adult)
While we were waiting for the cattle drive to arrive in their rest stop at the rec area near the river, they were engaged in conversation. That's a natural. Closer in age than anyone else who was waiting and with career topics in common.
It's hard to believe that for eight months my husband and I had tried desperately to conceive this child. We had been waiting, hoping, praying and then it happened... in November of 2010, two pink lines confirmed what we had been wanting for months. We were going to have our second child.
with an armed guard.
- QuikKutz Revolution Tool with the Squared & Circle Scalloped diecut
circled in slivers of high yellow moons...
2010.08.09 Iraq Baghdad 3 10 Three traffic cops are taken down by Jihadi bombers.
We asked Lee to pull 3 of her favourite looks for us. She had named and created an outfit for every occassion!
Donations from outside Spain:(International Transfers)
12:00 - Lunch time: peanut butter and jelly sandwiches, cantaloupe, pretzels
Sadly it would seem that our gravitation towards a consumable, disposable future means leaving the shopping mall with an item of attire that will hold its shape, colour and texture for a year at most.
Tea fire which destroyed 111 homes and threatened 1,500 others, was about 40% contained by Saturday night.
Was that the last thing she ever said? Why say it that morning? Was she worried? Did she know something I didn’t? No matter how many times I go through it, I just don’t know.
I have a 3 years old brother.
Last Week: 323
I wanted to share two cards with you that I made. For my first card I used Boo Boo Bear, he is so super cute that I couldn't resist this little guy and wanted to play with it. :)) I distressed all the edges on the card with brown chalk so the papers wouldn't look to sweet. I also put bling on the hearts of the flowers to give it some extra sparkle.
and when you wanted love i bled myself again
So, we all agree on” maa ki rasoi “ as in ‘mum’s kitchen but with a difference’!
Sleep with someone else. Preferably someone hotter and more interesting. Honestly, interesting can really be taken out of the equation. As long as you have hotter, you're probably fine.
Indeed, can even a small corporation get a waiver? Small businesses provide most new jobs, but the answer is obvious: Waivers are mostly, if not entirely, for politically significant businesses and unions that get the special attention of HHS or the White House. The rest of us must obey the laws.
HELP!!! (that’s worth 10 points!!)
Rolled Spelt
Get some sort of system that will broadcast one-sided opinions of yourself across the target base. The target base can be your family, school, office, local electorate, nation or EVEN THE WORLD! Get a communications satellite onside and you can even begin to indoctrinate hypothetical space aliens! The message itself does not need to have much substance. It doesn’t even need to be true. Try for something emotive, something that will push people’s buttons. Like a picture of yourself holding a cute little cat on a hill of rolling grass, with captions along the lines of “OUR GREAT LEADER CARES FOR EVEN THE SMALLEST OF HIS SUBJECTS.” Make sure you do it in capitals though. Repeat the message as much as possible, with plentiful variations from a number of different angles. Look at the techniques of modern day advertising companies for extra tips.
Time to sit back and stroke your golden goose, France has a benefits program that will make your toes curl. The healthcare options are outstanding. Being American, I appreciate this even more. It’s a great comfort to know that the financial burden of being ill has been lifted. Having kids also brings another bundle of joy -- tax reductions and government checks!
In the past few weeks, we've had a few instances of accidents and illnesses. I took my daughter to the doctor once but really wasn't impressed. (Of course, it didn't help that when we took her to the doctor, her symptoms disappeared.) Yesterday both my son and my daughter hit their heads pretty hard and cracked them open a bit. My son has a gash, but he wasn't bleeding profusely and the gash didn't look deep or wide. I really wanted to avoid a visit to the emergency room as people have repeatedly told me that it will be a bad experience. My daughter was hit by a bicycle and has a pretty large goose egg on the back of her head. Both are doing fine.
The rest of the cast of 13 are made up of various politicians and businessman -- from Zuma to his nephew turned tenderpreneur, Khulubuse Zuma.
A recent article provides a reminder, and other helpful information, on the need to be very careful with medications, and the number of them, with the older adult population.
SARA MCCLUNG came up with the concept of Blog Me MAYbe.
"Khaki pants are for young guys that think they're gang members."
Show and Tell Friday @ My Romantic Home
3: Sam & Luna
2 cups sliced okra, thawed
Now we all know that the more plural minded a president, the safer for every demographic, so make your own conclusions where Santorum belongs, in a goody 2 shoes parents category (of people old enough to be Santorum’s parents or Santorum presuming to be a parent to people who are not even Santorum’s children) or someone borderline psycho – ‘anti-Voltaire Syndrome’ or Spanish Inquisitor type person.
Wander and Ponders whilst not very popular are very fun to make and i may be continuing this series, you will have to wait and see!
To take a peek at the other fabulous new release creations in today's hop, please click on the links below... not all will be there yet, they should all be live at 12.00PM EST (that is 18.00 for Europe and 17:00 for the UK), please if you find blogs without today's hop could you please do another hop after that time?
i was not sure if i would blog today, but it's raining outside, and i processed some photos last night, so i thought, "oh, why not?"
The film makes fabulous swipes at the hero-dominated industry, as Suryakant (Naserruddin Shah) is now playing a son to his previous heroine who is now stale and passe enough to play his mother. To have a woman asserting her only power in this industry by selling sex through her item numbers and scandalous films is a great rejoinder to the men she uses along the way. The dialogues were so filmi and powerful in the Nyla moments and Silk's big speech at the awards. They were the right mix of topical issues and seeti-inducing! Suryakant is perhaps one of the most fabulous roles Naseeruddin has played for a long time! The way he drawls out his sleazy lines and filmi dialogues is downright worth the DVD. The less said about Tusshar in his silly and camp side role the better!
Ron Brown is fearless. At least he seems so. He lives his Christian life like he played as a college and NFL defensive back. Like a roving safety, Brown defends his ground, looks for breakdowns, and tackles the opposition. His love of Christ trumps all. It is amazing to read stories in an Omaha newspaper about how he has won over a Muslim running back by his daily faithfulness. I also hear many more stories through friends close to him of steady, intentional Christian living. Therefore, before we observe or say anything else we can be challenged and encouraged. This guy is a rare jewel in contemporary evangelicalism. And he is living it out in a media fishbowl.
3/4 teaspoon fresh or dried mint (finely chopped if fresh)
DaNita Blogged:
Mostly c) Oh dear, you appear to have been brainwashed by the anti-smoking lobbyists :)
After discussing this with my inner circle, I finally decided to start a blog and have committed myself to keeping up with it.
FORCE is a remake of the 2003 Tamil Hit KAAKA KAAKA; it was deftly directed by Gautam Menon, brilliantly enacted by Surya and had foot tapping music by Harris Jayaraj. The movie won quite a few awards that year and therefore it merits analysis as to why the Hindi remake is not as forceful as the Tamil original, despite having a competent director like Nishikant Kamat of Mumbai Meri Jaan fame and Harris Jayaraj composing the music.
They recite the Lord’s prayer
I made cupcakes from a plain old box cake mix. After they were cool, I cut a hole in the top and filled it with the mini chocolate chips or a gummi worm! I filled the hole with frosting and then frosted the top with red frosting. After the top was frosted, I dipped it in red sprinkles. The stem is half of a pretzel stick and the leaf is a green jelly spearmint leaf, rolled out flat and cut to size.
He had a dream he wanted to make his friends a little treat.
I hear chimes of angels
"Deal or No Deal. See that state?"
Not too much pondering as to corporate motive is required, however: Eiffage is a construction group specialising in public sector projects. It is a 13 billion euro turnover group which built, among other things, the world-famous Millau Viaduct, the A65 Pau-Langon autoroute, and the National Police Headquarters. (Eiffage’s corporate slogan is ‘talent in harmony’. Hmm.)
That makes our styles very different - and tonight - my mom came to help get Bug to and from dance and with her she brought supplies and a vision for this Fab-u-lous Fall Candle.
"The assault on Planned Parenthood is a calculated political assault by conservatives and we will not stand by as crucial funding for services for middle class and lower income women are abolished. If they pull out, we pull out! No more donations to the Susan G. Komen Foundation!” said Tamika D. Mallory, NAN National Executive Director.
Coming OKC-DFW, the approach was high, which meant a steep descent, and to top it off, we had to do three S-turns (either to bleed off speed or to open up the distance to whoever was in front of us), and each turn had a fairly high yaw.
The association’s president and attorney aren’t talking. Public records detailing the steps they have taken show McCarn’s house is just one of six the association is seeking to rent out. That doesn’t count homes the association has taken in foreclosure and is now renting.
For the accessory part I chose one of my current favourite jewellery labels - Mawi. The earrings as well as the the ring are both having these lovely studded details and still look precious. I thought this would perfectly go with the McQueen dress. As a little detail for the wrist, I took a bracelet by Nialaya which seem to be the absolute boom over here in the UK (and in the US..). A little glitzy, a little shiny - exactly what I like (which remembers me that I should take out mine soon and wear it!).
I have had over 40 images accepted in exhibitions this year, but I have never won an award, as these are reserved for the best of the accepted images. Amazingly in the colour print section all 4 of my prints were accepted, with 3 of them gaining awards including 1 medal with that image gaining the maximum score of 15 with each judge scoring it 5.
Usually, though, no matter how crazy our forced partners in musical crime are, they are too much in awe of the performer to be so rude as to talk loudly during the show. And they even have a helpful announcement just before the kick-off: PLEASE DO NOT TALK DURING THE PERFORMANCE. Maybe it's just me, and my lack of imagination, but I tend to take that to mean we shouldn't talk during the performance. Since it's a small space, talking could easily disturb both the performer and the patrons, so it would make sense to just shut your yap and enjoy the show, right? No, it turns out there's an exception: Telluride.
Once they fledged back at night
Were suddenly all U.S. citizens to be called home from wherever they live in the world, a flood of millions would pour across the borders. Some would hardly seem American, having been away so long. Some of them would be deeply resentful.
anyways, here's my card
Massive Attack Save from harm UK
the fridge, next to your computer while surfing the web or enjoying our
Back to the wedding quilt today. Of course, no photos until after the wedding...unless you know where to look. (I can still share, but you'll only know where to look if you've been following my blog for a while!)
The air has been astonishingly clear today. This is what I believe they call Sky Blue (real sky photo from my garden today):
Kami-sama: Joshua Tsubaki Wu
Have a great week everyone, clothes are packed, road snacks are packed, the bathroom has been cleaned and the kitchen has been tidied. The afternoon is me time, I can relax and sew, and daydream of what fabric these shops will hold. Hmmmm....what will I get!!!!
If you are interested please leave me a message on here.
The response:'You're an adult you can cope with it....'
Our family values giving gifts made by hand and sharing kind words through home made cards. We don't, however, manage our time particularly well and have always had trouble separating the kids and giving them each a chance to make something special for their siblings and parents. I mean, you wouldn't want to see your card being made, right?
7. Drop the macaron tray on a flat surface to knock out air bubbles and leave to stand for 30 minutes for the macarons to form a skin.
Lost Generation of Appleton has been together for about three years now and has an EP out that includes three original songs. Band members include Nathan Schultz on lead vocals and guitar; Melissa Simmons on vocals and guitar; Dakota Summers on bass guitar; and Dave Schultz on drums.
Finally, some linkage.
* There is no way to be a perfect mother, and a million ways to be a good one ~ Jill Churchill
Colin rebalanced the pizzas and followed Brumby toward the double doors. “It’s kind of nice to know a wealthy man like Mr. Templeton-Hyde likes pizza. Makes you think we’re all basically the same, you know?”
The emotional side of a relationship refers to communications, emotional support, loving, and caring side of a relationship. Does your partner offer great advice and/or listen and give you constructive feedback when you are having a bad day or a problem arises? If you just lost a love one, is your partner by your side or distant? Does your partner listen to you when you have a great idea, or do they have the mentality “it’s my way or the highway”? Is communication between your partner open and does it flow freely or does your partner avoid communication especially when discussing something serious? Do you feel loved? The emotional category is one of the most important categories of them all. What’s a relationship without the ability to communicate clearly and strong emotional support? Unfortunately, the emotional category tends to be the most neglected in relationships.
513 *D-I/25/1959. “Freedom, Justice and the Rule of Law: An Introduction to Due Process of Law.” Hillel Foundation Jewish Student Center, The University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois. (Included in Item C-1964(1), above, pp. 643-80. Incorporated in Item C-1964(6), above.)
“Today I want to talk to you about how Britain needs to change—and how Labour can be the people who bring that change.
“Stupidity” continued nonetheless. America’s “battle plan” was a carbon-copy of what the flailing French had used; “no clear objective, an unrealistic concept, an over reliance upon airpower and an underestimation of the enemy,…”.
But that's the point. If you dig from America, you won't come out anywhere near China.
who is:
“It comes from them?” I mumbled.
*Roger Sterling Line Of The Week – When told of Betty’s health crisis he responds, “Well… that would solve everything.”
Responding to remote performance issues requires the use of the same techniques and approaches you would use with a co-located performance issue. Of course it will take more time, require the use of technology and adaptation to some cultural issues. The Big Dogz know that paying attention to the potential performance issue signs will pay off in the long run.
Patrick Morley, founder of Casselberry, Fla.–based Man in the Mirror, kick-started a process that paired young men who want a mentor with older men who want to share their lives. Nearly two-thirds of the men in the room made connections.
I am especially encouraged that the head of the department was held accountable for refusing to discipline the perpetrators on his force.
The picture above gives you an idea of how the process works. I used 2 pennies (cheapest embellishments around - hehe). I covered the pennies with paper to help them blend in with the scene. The weight of the pennies help the image roll along.
Mix in flour mixture and buttermilk alternating starting and ending with flour. ( I did 3 flour additions and 2 buttermilk additions)
That’s what comes to mind in the present. To be fair, I have also experienced extreme amounts of joy because of the Red Sox. But it’s looking far too much like distant past. But like a true New England fan, I’ll keep watching. And hoping. No matter how long it takes. 86 years? No problem, we’ve toughed it out and we can tough it out again. We’re a hardy group.
Diabetic Exchanges: 3 lean meat, 1 fat
Not so for the male who separates from his family—those original children will fade in importance in favor of children he has with his new one or, in some cases, even the new stepchildren. He often decries even paying child support, saying [I am so sick of hearing this], “If she would only spend it on the kids…” like she’s not “spending it on the kids” every time she pays the light bill.
Instead of asking me to defend my decision to pick up and comfort my child when they are sad or in need, how about I ask you to defend your decision to let them cry it out? What do you think your kids are trying to communicate when they cry? Do you like being left alone when you are sad, with no one there to comfort you? Do you think your kids enjoy being left alone when they are sad? Do you think that there is nothing to gain by comforting them?
This is a twist worthy of M. Shlamalayayalongnameindianguywhomakesbadmovies.
Good Morning Peachies! March is only a few days away which means a NEW Peachy Keen Stamp Kit of the Month and a NEW Peachy Picks Kit!!
in a past we all must enter.
Watch the news conference below:
As I said in my last rebuttal to Mr. Palm, the Church has issued various statements about inerrancy in the last 50 years (such as the 1998 CDF statement) but they are all anemic and leave the door open for someone to hold that the Bible is only inerrant when it speaks of salvation. . . .
Gordon G. Chang is trained as a lawyer and is the author of the 2001 book, The Coming Collapse of China. Over 10 years ago he famously predicted that the Communist Party would collapse—and famously, it did not come to pass.
Gaining weight wan't my only problem- other changes were happening as well. I started missing periods, I started growing dark hair in places that I hadn't before, my skin started breaking out more, and instead of gaining weight all over, a lot of my weight was ending up around my abdomen. The university nurse practitioner wondered if I suddenly had poly-cycstic ovarian syndrome, but after testing for several of the regular symptoms associated with PCOS and getting negative results, the verdict was inconclusive. Several other doctors and multiple tests later, the results still do not point to signs of PCOS. According to blood tests, I also wasn't diabetic, and even though my thyroid was slightly lower than average, it wasn't low enough to cause a metabolic shut down. By normal medical measures, I was a happy and healthy person. I always had low blood pressure and a healthy heart rate, and I could still crank out 45 minutes of intense cardio whenever I wanted.
ATTORNEY: Do you recall the time that you examined the body?
Looks like even Abhisit is also staying glued to his laptop and himself gets his news Updates not from Thai MSM (coz he himself ordered Thai Media blackout) but from Twitter :
My approach to this challenge will be to tackle five or six paintings at one time. Underpaintings will be done and dried before moving on, then each painting will take over. Most of the painting will then be done wet-on-wet in oils. Final finishes may require the painting to be dry, which may mean having many paintings sitting around my studio unfinished for a week or so! It will also be challenging to paint landscapes on a small square canvas!
Whales are my passion. When I’m not writing, I do presentations at public schools and talk to kids about whales and the challenges they face. I can’t imagine doing anything else with whatever money I make. I’ve got a group targeted for donation, but I don’t want to say who until I work out a few details with them. Details coming soon!
This truth made me think of a lunch recently I was having with a writing friend who claimed that in one way or another, all novels are autobiographical. I had a hard time agreeing with her, so I tried to draw any parallels in my own work. I mean, here’s the gist of my book:
Connecting the murder to a series of pornographic drawings that have been sent to numerous women, they come across more victims of this serial killer, buried together in a woodland site.
I don’t know how Mark’s family will carry on the relationship that survives his death. It’s unique for every member. I remember after my brother died, my older brother and I headed out to Oregon first, in order to clean up any such scenes if Timm had died in similar arrears. (He was an alcoholic, but we heard he’d been in AA for a long while.) If there was any abuse going on, his girlfriend had cleaned all evidence away by the time we go there. I carried on my relationship with Timm by writing him verse letters and maintaining a blog about his life; my brother took Timm’s camera and has become a reawakened, gifted photographer.
Yep, I mowed. And edged. And used the blower thingy that almost knocks me over on full power. Observing the errant dandelion probes seeking the sun, and the leafier material growing in the lawn where leafy shit ought not grow, mowing was not anything to be avoided. I donned my best and finest Carl Spackler (Caddyshack, since so many of you missed it last inference) gear for the last time in what will become more than a year, and set to the task(s).
We pay our growers well above fair trade prices
The Hogsmill
Moriarty’s life, as depicted in his books seems to me to be a Jungian exercise in integrating the unconscious (Dé Dannan) aspects of himself with the coarser conscious (Fomorian). And it is a venture fraught with risks and which, as described in Nostos, left Moriarty floundering on the verge of one of Hopkins’s precipices and occasionally tipping over into psychosomatic chaos that left him both mentally and physically debilitated.
Michelle returned to the WWE looking like a soccer mom, and her skills inside the ring were noticeably worse than before she left…which wasn’t anything to write home about in the first place.
Cousins
Bill: vozka…
In fact, mass marketing, as enabled by mass media, is becoming frighteningly ubiquitous.
“The ‘virtual doors’ are now open for projects across the UK to start their own crowdfunding campaign through the SoLoCo site, giving them access directly to the public, a wider network than they have already, and without having to organise any sponsorship activities.
06. Mornin' - Al Jarreau / 4:17
7) Love – I’ve asked myself this question before, how do you know you’re in- love? Well I actually don’t know the answer to this one, but if you’re asking the question you pretty much know you’re there if not getting there and that’s one way to know you’ve struck gold!
To ensure I could keep an eye on her this morning, I put her out to pasture near the house. Around 10:00, a wildlife officer showed up to inspect our bee fence (that is, a fence to keep bears out–not keep bees in!). As we walked out, I noticed Shiloh out in her favorite semi-grassy and sunny area of the field, but with her tail cocked–as though she had to poop, but she didn’t. I told JR to run check on her. He ran about half way, and came back and clarified that she was indeed positioned with her tail up in a strange way. I kept my peripherial vision on her as the officer and I discussed the fence around our hives. Suddenly, Shiloh pawed the ground a few times, turned a circle, laid down on her side, and gave an obvious, HUGE contraction! It was time!!!! I apologized to the officer, asked her if she would mind if I went and checked on things since we had been waiting so long. Thankfully, she was as excited at the unplanned event as we were. JR ran into the house to collect everyone else, and we gathered along the tree line, ensuring plenty of safety and distance for Shiloh. I moved around a little so I could take pictures, and Shiloh never seemed to concerned about us there. Thank goodness for zoom cameras though!
My friend Mandy and I took a scrappy class today with about 10 other girls. What fun we had! I also learned a few new things so I had a great time. We made 4 one page layouts. Well....that is what we were supposed to do....I only finished 3. LOL.
They separate and are circling Brents gets him back up against he cage and lands some short blows.
An interesting step in the research would be to dive more deeply into the litigated patents and pull out the citation counts, ultimatly seeing if there is a model that can be developed for monetary settlements and citations.
4 Time Bomb 4:27
I just love everything about this layout. I used lots of scraps from Echo park and Bo Bunny
At this point, the eye still has usable vision and can function well if the other eye is covered. In the last (amblyopia) phase, which occurs after age seven, the eye loses all the sensitivity that is essential for good vision because it has not been used for so long.
But the party was never "progessive" at a national level. Successive Israeli governments fell apart under non-confidence motions in the Knesset right when the country faced a referendum on the latest round of political give-and-take with the Palestinian Authority. Shas deserted the government at these key moments. This abandonment went largely unnoticed at the beginning, when coalitions collapsed and Knesset members deserted like rats; but as Shas grew in influence, it increasingly threatened to desert - and did so - whenever political negotiations with the Palestinians came to a crux. Most recently, Shas single-handedly toppled the government of Ehud Olmert (something the catastrophic Israeli failure in the 2006 Lebanon War failed to
She says that he seems OK and that his nose looks kinda wet.
Chuck Colson was a politician who was implicated in the Watergate scandal. He ended up going from a powerful respected wealthy political position to imprisonment. In custody, he became a Christian, and on release founded the international organisation that is Prison Fellowship. He said this:
Android OS Version 2.1
Ilkley's back in my 'awesome books'.... not that they were ever in my bad books. They've moved up from my 'good books' to my 'awesome books' because they've started bottling my favourite Ilkley beer: Lotus IPA, as well as their Stout Mary.
The RN to BSN online health care degree for example offers advanced education and training to the technical RN in order to better prepare her for a position in public health nursing, in corporate nursing, or even as an assistant or director of Nursing in a health care facility. The addition of education and a more advanced degree opens new doors that would not have been possible for the RN just a few years ago due to time constraints.
I can certainly see why, with its slick interface and focus on a smaller network between closer friends, Path is appealing. Facebook is the master of social networks, but I’m not sure that it is suitable for certain types of posts that I may want to put up. Photos on Facebook tend to be mainly of people and usually of them having a good time. Photos on Instagram tend to be of things. These arty, beautiful photos of a tree you pass feel a bit poncy and unsuitable on Facebook, yet fit in perfectly on Instagram. In the same way I think in a smaller social network letting people know who I am with and what I am listening to seems more appropriate.
On any given day in San Francisco: I might be on a Muni bus, elbow to elbow with a little old lady carrying too many grocery bags, right behind a man in a suit checking his iPhone, trying not to bump into the punk rock kids who are late for school. When I get off the bus, I walk past a small alley where a couple of homeless men have set up camp, and I tip toe gingerly past them because it somehow feels like I’m trampling over their living room.
Have a glorious day and a great weekend!
So, Felix just got back from the land of Oriana. It’s okay if we haven’t heard of it because they don’t even have an airport. Felix LMAO’s at his own damn joke and I wonder if this is going to happen often. Nobody likes the guy who laughs too hard at his own joke, FELIX. GOSH.
Darren Connor started home brewing while attending college at Indiana University. “I made beer because I couldn’t buy it.”
into a vain and violent suicide
Boil and simmer for 5 minutes.
As well, the fit of See by Chloé dresses can be really unpredictable. Often sizing changes widely with different fabrications, silhouettes, and seasons. My own trials and errors follow.
Not sure where the expressionist stemmed from to be honest, for a long few years now and on the odd occasion (ok yes very odd) I do like a crisp sandwich, now your basic walkers or Seabrook’s are fine but there is just something lush about a cheesy Wotsit sandwich, a nice spread (not too much now) of salad cream, however despite liking crisps and the likes of bread and butter and some salad cream, our 5 year old does not feel that this combination together is entirely normal “you’re crazy” and “eugh” and “eww that’s gross” are the terms she used.
chickens (6)
Chamber of Commerce and from Florida’s top two trading partners, Brazil
they have spirit :-)
There’s only one post with a Canada tag. I simply mentioned that I’ve traveled to Canada. I really miss the doughnuts that my Tita Miketess bought in a market in Vancouver. Maybe I will write something about that trip.
Facilitators: Ruth E. Van Reken, co-founder of Families in Global Transition, co-author, Third Culture Kids: Growing Up Among Worlds; Fran Colley, Education Chair – Association of International Women (Indianapolis), Research Co-chair – Indiana Multiethnic Committee; and Christine Dowdeswell – Co-founder, Association of International Women (Indianapolis), co-founder FIGT, Alumni Board IU School of Liberal Arts, Indiana University, Purdue University, Indianapolis."
As some of you might know, I’m in the middle of a meaty corporate job. It’s an amazing opportunity, but for all the usual client confidentiality reasons I can’t go into detail. What I can tell you is: it’s tough, it’s fast and it’s working with some amazing people in an amazing industry.
Looking back on the past, I remember having relationships with people whom, at the time firmly believed that I was their one, and yet to me, at the back of my mind I did not fully believe that they were mine. But then I found myself wondering if I was basing that idea on the fact that I had a different definition of the one to them. Was I in fact the one but just did not know it, or was I right to walk away and continue my search? As time moved on I realised that what I was doing wrong was searching. Whatever our definition of The One, I now have faith that whatever we believe the one is, we won’t find them, they, like magic will find us and we will know one hundred percent that they are the one when we meet them.
- they are acquiring theirs.
I have run into another homeless person I starting seeing when I first became homeless. I had thought he had found his way back to permanent housing. But not so. I don't know where he has been for the months that I didn't see him.
“A six percent decrease is something to pay attention to,” said Kelly Miller, executive director ICADSV.
I fall down crying
Cardigan: Old Navy, $16.00
Hear her
So, my advice to all authors is:
The Year of the Lord’s Favor
Spray a bundt pan with non-stick spray. Roll pizza dough out in a rectangle- approx 6-8 inches wide but long enough to go around your bundt pan. Put stuffing mix all along the middle- then just fold the dough around the stuffing mix to form a tube. Carefully transfer into the bundt pan so it doesn't break apart.
no fate (for you are my fate, my sweet) i want
When our fear is naked and we face it with our hearts, we are naked and fearless.
COMEDY SERIES
It was in February that Martin Amis said he would have to be brain-damaged before writing a children's book.
yellow or pink for air
I estimate I could get it all done by the end of the half-term week vacation in May. Then just need to add some shopping cart / e-commerce capabilities to the site before the summer.
Accordingly, counsel should be aware that production of metadata is the “new normal,” and if a party’s “document” production fails to include appropriate metadata, a costly reproduction may well likely be required. In addition, parties’ social media postings are “in play” and, upon the appropriate showing, courts will not hesitate to order the production of such ESI.
"Old-school jazz and swing is what we play -- minus all the kitschy BS usually accompanying all that these days. We bring the repertoire just the right amount of drama and conviction and still keep it a party..."
Released today, the transcript school indicates that Obama, under the name Barry Soetoro, received financial aid as a foreign student from Indonesia as an undergraduate.
It was a full & sweet Christmas! Made perfect by the precious gift of Jesus, God's own Son! How amazing it is that he was born & gave up His life, so that we may have eternal life with Him in heaven! I love knowing that someday I will be with those precious family members that I'm missing so much right now!
"I know honey. I would too".
down Main Street;
in peace domesticated instead
Boogie Wipes are “snot your average wipe.” These wipes come is a 30-count pack are made with saline to dissolve stubborn boogies and make nose wiping a breeze. In addition to dissolving boogies (which these wipes do amazingly well), the wipes are super soft and come in fun scents like grape, fresh scent, menthol as well as unscented.
There’s no doubt that the creation of the global icon, Nelson Mandela (aka Madiba, his Xhosa clan name), was planned, most expertly and most discreetly, years before the average man on the street ever dreamed that a convicted terrorist would became a real live international symbol for freedom, justice, peace, goodness, love, forgiveness…, and all things bright and beautiful. It goes without saying - that they would have probably found someone else if Mandela did not exist. (By now, I presume, readers should know to whom I’m referring when I speak of, “they”.)
There must be another reason, then, for the West Bank's Christian exodus. The answer lies in Bethlehem. Under Israeli auspices, the city's Christian population grew by 57%. But under the Palestinian Authority since 1995, those numbers have plummeted. Palestinian gunmen seized Christian homes—compelling Israel to build a protective barrier between them and Jewish neighborhoods—and then occupied the Church of the Nativity, looting it and using it as a latrine. Today, Christians comprise a mere one-fifth of their holy city's population.
I struggle with when will I feel less like a babysitter and more like a mom? When will I be able to develop that bond? I don't know. I know it takes time and honestly time is not on our side this time. I'll explain that statement at a later time as I need to process it myself.
And sends them dancing to the sky.
In September, I left a position on the leadership team at a corporate franchise in the city to move back home to the country. I had been splitting my time between our country home, where my husband lived full-time, and the city, where my job was. Monday morning I would wake up early and drive the three hours to the city and return to the country early afternoon on Thursday and work from home the remainder of the week. Near the end of last summer, he asked me to please move home permanently and start really working on starting a family. The split-life was starting to take it’s toll and I decided my marriage was more important than my job and so in the fall, I packed up, left the city and subsequently left my job/career.
Martina Navratilova and Tony Dovolani danced the foxtrot. She looked like herself in rehearsal but had makeup and extensions and a dress and heels during the performance and looked the way she does in the photo. I thought she'd had work done but don't think so ... or maybe not much. Pretty! She did pretty well. The judges said she was too careful. Score: 7, 6, 7 = 20
get to know these organizations that have been dedicated for this cause:
I hopped on, felt that my stirrups were a bit long, thought, "Eh, whatever. He's used to that; he's a dressage horse," and walked around, just checking out the terrain for 10 minutes or so. Tried to pick up a trot and realized I was not used to long stirrups at all, so I dismounted, fixed them, and realized something else--I have to work on mounting from the ground and Joey needs to work on standing still for more than two seconds. So we moseyed over to the stool/table thing that I had used to mount up the first time. No problem--then I asked for a trot, and it was sayonara for Joey.
She is so sweet in her sun hat. You don't want her to get burned in the warm Florida sunshine! I used to put hats like this one on my girls when they were little and I guess that is why I love this image so much.
SS: One of the most difficult sections of a screenplay for young writers is the second act. Can you give us any secrets about how to dominate the second act?
I thought Run for Brighter Day was very well organized for a first-year race, and the only hiccup was running out of small shirts (the race organizers said they’d change this next year). You could tell the organizers were passionate about the cause, and they did an outstanding job.
Great offense was contributed by Jayme Gayheart, Calli Brown, Kennedy Shreve, and Meagan Grantham.
“Mom, I think you’re scaring her. Everything is new to her. She’s not used to that.”
I’ve done well. It’s been too years since I’ve stepped foot into a salon. Unfortunately, I’ve found a great satisfaction in cutting my hair, whether it’s needed it or not. And, taking out the scissors has been a fantastic stress reducer.
us for our failings, spitting out her rage
"It has been really heavy in the south west of England and there has also been quite a lot of thunder in central and eastern areas.
I didn't exactly have the best weekend. Drama and heartbreak are the best words to sum it, well, so would disappointment and disgust. I'd rather not get into because I don't want to dwell on it...I just gotta keep on swimming.
Coconut oil is solid at room temperature unless it's way too warm in the house like mine is (my frugal husband hates a.c.). To measure for baking you can melt it on the stove (it melts faster than butter!). I also keep a jar in the bathroom. When I'm using it as makeup remover, if it's particularly cool in the room and therefore the oil is solid, I take a little chunk and rub it in my hand for a few seconds and then soak the cotton ball.
Personally, I think some of the scariest moments in the whole book happen before Mr Mumbles is around. Reading those first four chapters, you know something terrible is coming, and that anticipation is almost worse than the terrible stuff itself.
Satan knew that none but God could touch Job; and when Satan was permitted to afflict him, Job was quite right in recognizing the Lord Himself as the doer of these things which He permitted to be done.
It has been interesting to watch the growth of the EDL over recent months, and most interesting to see how it is now becoming under the influence of undercover police and government agents.
For those of you who don't know, Saleabration lasts from 30 December to 28 February. During this time, for every £45 you spend on Stampin' Up! goodies, you get an exclusive, limited edition stamp set absolutely free! The stamp sets this year are absolutely beautiful. As can be seen below:
Can an FBI agent obsessed with redemption and a grieving widow desperate to clear her husband’s name learn to believe in love again?
I was thinking that I wish the church could be a place….
a 20cm (8in) Flan Dish
Below are a few updates on player vs. player comparisons I’ve done. College stats include yesterday’s games, but the NFL stats are only through last week’s games.
Stay tuned.
Holdin’ onto things that
Maybe Dan can cook after all, or maybe just one of them can. Because yet again they weren’t both there to hand over the food so Dan 2 could have cooked and Dan 1 delivered it. Or Dan’s wife could have cooked it. Or his mum. Or his Nan. Or some fab secret ready meals service in Essex.
I also found another blog entitled Demanding Euphoria,where the author says it just right! She quotes Calvin & Hobbs stating “That’s the difference between me and the rest of the world! Happiness isn’t good enough for me! I demand euphoria!”
he followed us on our holiday travels --
I THOUGHT that I wanted kind of a mix of the first and second wall. ……I thought……..
Janet Gaynor’s character, in particular, is a much softer portrayal of a rising starlet than Constance Bennett’s brassy waitress-on-the- make in Cukor’s movie. As starry-eyed Esther Blodgett, Gaynor is playing a character very similar to the sweet heroine of her previous film directed by Wellman, Small Town Girl (1936). Esther is someone who longs to escape from the frustrations of small-town existence, but who still keeps her caring values intact, and is happy to sacrifice herself when she falls in love. I haven’t seen enough of Gaynor’s roles to generalise with confidence, but suspect that this sweetness is an intrinsic part of her screen personality. In both films, people are always saying what a “nice girl” she is – even when she occasionally does things that might not fit that description.
The bank’s board, led by President Alexandre Tombini, said it sees significant structural changes in Brazil’s economy that will allow for lower interest rates, according to the minutes from its Jan. 17-18 meeting published today. The monetary policy committee, known as Copom, also cited a budget surplus before interest payments that will allow the ratio of public debt to gross domestic product to fall and slow the pace of credit market expansion for their decision.
So what do you do about it?
The Columbus Jewish community observance of Israel’s Memorial Day for soldiers and Terror Attack Victims, Yom HaZikaron, will be held at the JCC on College Avenue on Tuesday, April 24.
Both me-made pairs of pants are also from one basic stretch skinny jeans pattern. I made the flare pair in an indigo denim and the other skinny&cropped pair in a floral print.
well… LOOK NO FURTHER
My problem is I'm an aspirational spice owner. Believe me I have a ton. But I know I don't use them enough, and any future ones I buy I won't use enough beyond the teaspoon I need out of the whole jar. Recently I wrote about how RFID tagged consumer products will make it easier to shop and keep track of personal inventory. Another use besides knowing when to re-order toilet paper is to know what ingredients you have and what you can make out of them.
Me: He said I need a protective order. Doesn’t help me. It doesn’t matter. I can’t run away. They are going to do something.
Livin' On Livin'
How do I report spam that was sent to my e-mail address?
Wash whole sprigs of dill, pat dry and lay in pan. Place 4-6 thinly sliced lemon slices over top. Lay salmon over the dill/lemon. Drizzle a tiny bit of olive oil over top and a small amount of salt & pepper.
The Heart Fortress
I’ll see you in July.
A Norwich City Council spokeswoman said: “We were contacted on our out-of-hours number describing two Alsatian-type dogs that had been restrained on leads. “The caller was advised that we do not operate a 24/7 lost dog collection service and anyone reporting and restraining a dog out-of-hours will need to keep the dog until our normal service is available to arrange collection.” And if you can’t keep the dog? What are you supposed to do, release it and let it roam in traffic?
Most people assume that these clowns will do so much damage between now and 2015 that they couldn’t get elected dog-catcher. I don’t buy that.
It all started very early Saturday morning when I caught my middle girl, in the small hours, waking her younger sister sleeping in the bunk below.
I cooked this sweet and sour pork (kulo yoke) for my family's dinner before driving back to my hometown for Chinese New Year Celebration. This is one of my children favourite dish and I am sure your kids love this dish too.
Meanwhile, the chairman of the U.S. House Homeland Security Committee is furious over the leak that eventually proved that the supposed terrorist arrested in this latest staged event was actually working for the CIA and Saudi Intelligence.
I think this is where I’ve been having issues when it comes to finding someone to settle down with. I’m so independent & self-sufficient; I really don’t NEED a man. So, that quote really made me think: what qualities does my future husband need that I can’t do??
Thank you Sugardoodle and all the women that left these comments for your wonderful ideas!
4. Bake in the center of the oven for 45 minutes. Remove the cake from the oven and run a knife all the way around the edges to release the cake. Return the cheesecake to the oven, turn off the heat, and let stand without opening the door for another 15 minutes. Remove the cake from the oven and let cool completely. Cover the cheesecake and refrigerate for at least 3 hours, preferably overnight.
For iPod Touch Users
That is the motto that fills our hearts
1) 5X2 Hang Power Clean (full stall) @ 85% – rest 45 sec.
Last night, CBS aired episode 3.22 of The Good Wife. Entitled ‘The Dream Team’ and serving as this season’s season finale, the episode featured two of my favorite guest stars on the show, Martha Plimpton as Patti Nyholm and Michael J. Fox as Alicia’s most formidable opponent, Louis Canning. I am going on the record right now to say that The Good Wife has the BEST guest stars on television (Matthew Perry, Mamie Gummer, Carrie Preston, to name a few), but Michael J. Fox is my all time favorite. When he shows up, you know it’s going to be a great, dramatic episode, and this episode was no exception. Mr. Canning and Ms. Nyholm did, in fact, show up to stir things up with an evil plan to destroy Lockhart & Gardner! In the end, it was all a distraction so that the ‘dream team’ could poach Lockhart & Gardner’s biggest client.
The trinity of aspects: -
Definition of OPPROBRIUM
Many of the world’s languages could become extinct if more is not done to protect threatened environments, scientists say.
After the flowers roused me, I sat at my scrappin' table and forced myself to clean it up. The Hubs and kids interrupted that with dinner for me, then cake (from Cold Stone Creamery) and presents. Two of my gifts were DVDs of Avatar (yay!) and August Rush. We watched August Rush after those festivities ended and then to beddie bye.
Cut refrigerated dough into two equal halves. Place one half onto a clean counter space dusted with sweet rice flour and place the other half back into the refrigerator. Dust a rolling pin with rice flour and roll dough into an even sized oval or circle (about 1/2 inch thick). Coat cookie cutters in flour and cut shapes out of dough. Cut and lift carefully, as the dough is more crumbly than traditional sugar cookie dough. Place cut out cookies onto parchment paper or silpat lined baking sheets. These cookies spread more than my favorite "with gluten" sugar cookie recipe, so I recommend popping the baking sheet in the freezer for about 10 minutes prior to baking. Bake cookies at 350 degrees for about 10 minutes, or until bottoms are slightly golden.
Chihuahua: ” Meh, they’re not so special. “
To me, trust and honesty are two of the absolute biggest aspects of this hobby.....and I take them very seriously. I do my best to gain those traits and I cherish the numerous relationships I have built in the hobby as a result.
Too much scientific evidence points to the understanding that being gay is not a lifestyle and/or choice. I’m in a privileged position because I have access to the scientific documentation that has been published about it. The average joe wanting more information might know to search through places like Scirus and Google Scholar, but without paying $30+ for each article they want to read, all they have access to are abstracts. Even those that might have access to scientific journals because they’re college/grad students might not have the scientific background to understand completely the language being used in said articles. I not only have the access but the proper scientific background. All studies done thus far indicate that chemical receptors in the brain of GLBTQ individuals behave differently than they would for their heterosexual counterparts. Because the difference in brain action is CLEAR, it’s obvious that this is not a choice being made to BE GLBTQ. It is their choice to embrace their physiology, but that’s it.
picked this book up, I did so with trepidation. When I came to read it, I’d just read another book that tackled religious views and that had succeeded in offending me. So, knowing that this book was going to tackle angels and demons, I figured that there would be some form of religious background to it that might turn my pre-existing spark of frustration into something more. Luckily, I had absolutely nothing to fear.
I’ll give you an example: I heard a certain person say, during Operation Cast Lead, that we have to cause the other side to understand that ba’al habayit hishtagea – that Israel has “gone crazy.” That’s absolutely unacceptable. In fact, we have to cause them to appreciate the very opposite: that Israel is anything but crazy. That Israel acts aggressively only because it has no chance. It hits people only because it has to. It hits non-dangerous people only in a case of collateral damage, while making immense efforts not to harm them.
‘Get what’? Was my curiosity-piqued response, to which Kay responded simply, “How you find the pony in an extreeeeemmmmeeely challenging environment”…
(I should add ‘provisionally’ to the title for a reason I shall be sure to expound upon soon)
Here’s the thing: we know the Grimtotem operations in Feralas and Dustwallow were being coordinated by Arnak Grimtotem and Isha Gloomaxe. We also know that those two – along with a couple other high-ranking Grimtotem – are dead now, courtesy of (ugh) Johnny Awesome. And now that Magatha is on the loose again (oh and did I mention DAMMIT DAMMIT DAMMIT DAMMIT FUCK YOU JOHNNY AWESOME FUCK YOU RIGHT UP YOUR FUCKING ASS), smart money says she’s going to be keeping a close eye on the search, seeing as the plan most likely came from her in the first place.
E. Smokin' Seventeen
Soda pop fountains are under each tree
(Note: I don't reckon that their E-mail works, I tried it but it kept on bouncing back)
I sponged half the nail with Rimmel London Apricot Punch and stamped with Konad White and BM205. I also added some New York Summer glitter (I think this one is called Las Vegas??) but in hindsight I should have probably left this out. It looks like the butterflies are being attacked by a swarm of insects. Lol!
I don't believe there is a god out there that is going to change the chemical imbalance in my sons brain. There is not a god that can go back and prevent Noah's birth mother from drinking alcohol. Or make the baby hospital actually take care of him.
First,we extend a big thank you to all of you who entered our Special Monthly Challenge last week sponsored by those lovely people at Simon Says Stamp.
The war raged on for another three years, and it was only after it ended, in 1946, that the survivors began their annual reunion ceremony. Mr. Hite, Mr. Thatcher, Mr. Griffin, Mr. Cole and Mr. Saylor will gather next week in Dayton, Ohio, at Wright-Patterson Air Force Base for the events marking the 70th anniversary of the raid. It’s expected to be the last time the five men will come together.
Nigeria is holding the first of the year’s elections tomorrow, according to BBC News, which will determine state legislatures and governors. The president and national assembly are being elected on the 21st.
Friends, that's it.
One time she didn’t do the essay we had three weeks to do. Later after she spoke to the teacher, she told me that she got an extension. I believed her. Even though I never saw her hand it in.
Curried Chicken Sauté
Emme - "Does he look like an angel?"
I couldn't find any stamps with Starwars so had to print a picture.
the honey and lemons for all the sorethroats;
Suzannah (Soooz) is now marooned on a desert island without any hope of rescue in the foreseeable future. She’s been washed ashore with little in the way of possessions, but thankfully with a pile of books for company. Here are her views on the books she’s brought with her . . .
Busy, a new feeling, even if it was only for one day. The weekend was the busiest for weeks, handy because now I might nearly make enough to pay a few bills.
Your heart cannot hurt yourself because it is the center of loving feelings. Completely opening your heart heals on the deepest levels so you can feel whole, complete, satisfied and fulfilled from moment to moment in your life.
was: $15.99
Just now I got back home from the grocery store and when I unloaded the groceries, I stood back and looked in amazement about the choices I made. I didn't even go there thinking "I need to get just healthy stuff", which makes it even more surprising.
Lonnie Mack: Baby What's Wrong
12. Unschoolers are confident because they've never been shamed.
Those with BPD often report feelings of emptiness; they feel excluded from society, isolated and lonely. (I know I’ve had all of those feelings.) Sometimes, I’m feeling lonely and don’t realize it; I only know something doesn’t feel right.
It was made like a shadowbox with three square metal trivets placed inside boxes with a green mat placed on top. Actually, after tearing it apart we discovered that the metal trivets were not really metal, but plastic painted to look like metal and the boxes were made out of Styrofoam.
My hands are just too full, and my minds jumpin too fast.
But short of guarding at-risk journalists, there may be no practical way to prevent the number of journalists killed from scaling ever higher on the statistical charts. Mexico’s presidents have ordered the Mexican Army to such guard duty at times beginning in the late-1990s. (This author rode with Mexican Army troops guarding investigative reporter and editor Jesus Blancornelas of Zeta in Tijuana, when Blancornelas was still alive and crusading against the cartels.) But that is a very expensive and cumbersome solution. And only high-level journalists like Blancornelas could make such an arrangement work and not let it get in the way of their work.
His idea of reform has been for the worse, not the better – unless you’re rich, white, male and/or big business.
And then there is the part of me that hates that I spend hours and hours pinning things, looking at other people’s pins, feeling generally bad about the way my house looks compared to the pins (I mean, people keep pinning a bedroom that has a water slide down to a pool, who the hell really lives in a house like that?), repinning other people’s pins, exclaiming I could totally make that myself (which I can’t, see Martha Stewart no carve pumpkin reference above).
“How fascinating!” I exclaimed. “Did it taste good?”
There are a lot of details and words embedded within the picture itself that the reader is not aware of as words. In Eisner’s section this would be in the area he discusses how a picture can tell and clarify a story much quicker. An artist takes a writer’s paragraph or two and condenses into a single panel in a page and it conveys all of that information. In this image form all of the information can be taken in quickly and there is no misunderstanding of where or how ‘Spiderman was on the wall.’
Posted on Mar 29, 2011, Source: Democracy Now!
so i popped on over. and i really liked what i read!... the most recent post, especially. not only do i quite agree with what he wrote, but i found it very inspiring to myself as both an artist and as a tends-to-be-emotional person who is often affected by tension. his thoughts made me consider embracing tension, rather than avoiding it. and that would have a big impact on my blog, my photography habits and anything else i do that is creative.
As you can imagine, this turn of events left the U.S. in quite a pickle: In 1804, Americans were not yet willing to extend the revolutionary ideals of equality they had just established for themselves to their black slaves, and quite frankly, Haiti's ability to do so scared the pants off of them. It wasn't really a high point in American diplomatic history, and so the Haitian Revolution maybe has gotten dusted under the rug a bit in the history books. So this new exhibit is a welcome reprieve from that omission, putting the events in Haiti in their rightful place in the global narrative of that revolutionary period.
He rubbed his grainy, salt-dried heels together beneath the desk and reset the typewriter.
Last week, I arrived to a slim envelope in my vestibule. When I opened it, it contained the final, printed jacket to The Mapmaker and the Ghost.
I saw this tune posted on one of the other blogs i follow, but it was probably over a year ago at this point. Here it is again.
Because of the amazing, eclectic offering of antique and bespoke furniture - and the Jack Russell mascot Dotty - I desperately want to go to London and shop at Howe. After pouring through the entire website, I am bitter that Howe is across the Atlantic. Selfishly, I would love to have it as a more accessible resource...and I desperately want to befriend the proprietor Christopher Howe.
5) Payment of N999m in 128 times within 24 hours to some companies totalling N127.872b by the office the Accountant-General of the Federation.
But I don’t have the time or the energy to stay in touch with everyone. I have kids, a girlfriend (maybe), comedy work, and even a few friends here in London. I am trying to make ‘now’ work. I don’t have time for 1999 let alone 1979.
Auntie Courtney is the coolest!
laundry
Season and add a few drops of olive oil.
At the moment he broke down, ITV (of course) went for a commercial break, and then came back explaining what had happened and then they went to cut scene of little Malaki’s mother saying how he loves to perform, but he has nerves and that he always had her to look to whenever he got quivery.. As soon as he started sobbing, both Amanda and Alesha started to well up looking shocked, they both started to get up, but Alesha got to him first as well as his mum. Alesha checked to see if he wanted to continue his performance.
'We expect these issues to be dealt with quickly and effectively to ensure high quality, safe care for patients. Their progress will be closely and rigorously overseen by Monitor.' continues here
A footnote now on a post made yesterday about a meeting I attended. Some people were confused by the image which showed the Bridgend Organiser with two other people. Do not ask me how but some people thought it was the meeting itself and included a photo of myself! It was not. It was taken at theRWB.
opens the hearts
" If you get a cold, you get a cold. It has nothing to do with me."
I was sort of dreading this week’s letter, as many participants in Jenny Matlock’s Alphabe-Thursday probably were. I kept thinking words that would work if I was willing to cheat a little; “eXamine” or “eXclaim” and so on.
and, yes, there is a difference."
It's been nearly two years since we moved from our old house. (We moved in Oct '07 and spent a few months in a rented house before finally moving in here in Jan '08). I miss my old home. I miss my old life and mostly I miss my old friends. So much so that I have never bothered to embrace the new place I have found myself in. Instead of becoming part of this community I have spent my time daydreaming about going back to my old one. Instead of making new friends that I can hang out with, I started to hang out almost entirely on the blogsphere. Now please, please don't get me wrong. I love, love, LOVE all my blogging buddies. I ADORE hanging out with you and I am grateful that I have each and everyone of you in my life but none of you live close enough to go to the movies or share the odd glass of wine and a natter. I miss that. I need tangible friends as well as my very excellent virtual ones. It's taken a while for me to really internalize it but this is my home now so I'm giving up longing to be elsewhere. I have a great house in a beautiful place. My children love their schools and my husband actually manages to get home from work in time to have dinner with the family. (His old commute was nearly 5 hours a day!). I am very lucky to have a part time job which gives me the freedom to be there for my children and gives me the time to do other things with my life if only I managed that time better. In short I am a very lucky girl. It's high time I embraced it and appreciated it. Part and parcel of this is that we have started making our mark on the house. As I write Hubby is painting all the woodwork in the hall - including the stairs themselves, having already relaid the parquet flooring and built a new understairs cupboard. My excitement knows no bounds. I may have moved into this house 19 months ago but it's finally becoming a home. This makes me very happy indeed.
Somehow I think that the following May Day celebration was not for the 'working class' and an up market band would have been required.
“What’s this say?” I asked as I turned the scrip every which way, trying to decipher it.
saraban13
- Donate items to sell in the rummage sale. Rummage sale items can be dropped off Monday – Thursday, April 9th-12th (3pm-5pm) behind the High School in the Band Trailer, or on Friday, April 13th (3 pm – 8pm) in the SMS Cafeteria.
- Melt butter then add to a mixing bowl along with sugar, eggs, and vanilla
Don’t miss this unique opportunity to join with other women entrepreneurs in a supportive environment to develop focused action plans for your business.
My beacon in the dusk
Love Elaine xx
- The Origin Series: How the World Came to Be (A.E Wilder-Smith)
The writing I do now is the result of a wild imagination that I have had since I was a child. It was always about action or adventure. It was about that imaginary guy driving the Hotwheels car over bridges that were collapsing and making it across just in time to go off to save the day. Or maybe I was flying that model of the Starship Enterprise around the confines of my bedroom and then beaming down to some planet to once again, save the day.
I thought he sought the privacy of rain,
The bag itself was fairly simple to put together: I just folded a piece of canvas in half, stitched up both sides and turned it inside out. I folded over the top edge and sewed it and then covered it with some white lace to hide the stitches (hey, I didn't say I was GOOD at sewing LOL!). I stamped the sentiment onto a manila tag and attached to to the bag with some ribbon. It can easily be tucked inside as shown below.
And if anyone has a sausage recipe I would love to use it in my book.
A note to anyone who finds themselves at 505 Flower: as tempting as that glowing wall may seem, it’s a really tough background for a Kodak moment. My friend Maya took the above picture, and she took about 15 just so I could have one that turned out semi-decently. I have a hunch that not many people will look good in front of that shade of glowing yellow. But if you’re in downtown LA, I invite you to go and prove me wrong!
Also, I finally finished something I've been wanting to get to for a while - a hairbow holder for the little girl. She is finally getting some length on her hair so I wanted the bows to be out so I'll remember to use them. I bought the O plain and painted it green to match her room and bought the jungle animals ribbon, which did not photograph well , to go with. (Note: I have since moved this to her room and it is against yellow paint there and I think it looks better - I'll have to take another pic soon!)
While the original settlers had come mainly from the Netherlands and Friesland, their numbers had been swelled by French and German religious refugees, and by then they had integrated, to become Afrikaners. The full details of the gradual but steadily mounting fermentation of dissatisfaction among the Afrikaners under British rule are too many and varied to included here, but there was, for example, the disadvantage of not being provided an interpreter, if and when they were required to appear in court.
I'm entering this into the following fab challenges:
–Nadine Gordimer
I pre-ordered her next book, Rustic Wrappings, and am patiently awaiting its delivery in July! The class I signed up for includes a project from this book.
A manyatta is a hut made of mud and dung supported using branches from trees.
Oeps, I completely forgot to post some new press on my blog. I posted some of it on facebook and can't remember if I tweeted. TOO many things to maintain! Anyway I am proud to share this wonderful artist profile in Dutch magazine Residence which since the arrival of editor in chief Jantien Nunnikhoven has become an absolute gem. Jantien also asked me to do an illustraion for the magazine with the theme "Holland's Glorie". Thank you Residence, Jantien and team for the wonderful exposure!
OAKLAND: ESPN’s Adam Schefter reports that Leniart has a visit scheduled to Oakland is likely to sign with the Raiders within the next week.
I learned to bat for the first time...
I resisted the urge to plant my tomatoes. I planted my watermelon plants instead. They froze. The end.
Government departments that fund the IoM
The spread out and multiply to become proper hedgerows of large, bright green leaves and sprightly purple flowers each year.
"Yes, your instincts are excellent. Rigidity. Fixed eyes. No organic cause. Normal neurological function."
Most social networks make it possible for users to make their website either exclusive or public. Private sites are just offered to the user and other individuals he especially accepts to watch his site while public websites are readily available to all users of the system. These exact same functionalities additionally install on the blog sites which are kept on a social network. For this reason blog writers have to figure out whether or not they want to make their article offered to the entire social network or to only a portion of this network.
The thieves of the revolutions must not deceive or make a mockery of the people. There are people who steal revolutions from their owners. They excel at this.
Into the ground
She's number one rated but she's already jaded
* "The Black Cat" by Edgar A. Poe
or whatever inspires you.
On the release day for Limahl’s new song “1983″, co-written with Rune Maurtvedt, Tommy Olsen, and Stig Antonsen, he took time for a great and open-hearted conversation with radio and journalism veteran Larry Flick (Billboard, Paisley Park etc) on the US satellite radio network Sirius XM. The interview went out live and nationwide on Flick’s show “the Morning Jolt.” The publicly quoted Sirius XM has 21.9 million subscribers and reportedly over 35 million daily listeners of its 135 radio channels.
2. Shopinas.com is set to battle in the PBA for the first time. A new team in an old battleground; isn’t that a good reason enough? Franz Pumaren will spearhead this young squad. I am very intrigued at this, since coach Franz is responsible for the 4-straight championships (1998-2001) of the De La Salle University. His Press gave six title to the green and white squad, although one was stripped because La Salle fielded an illegal player (2004). Because of this, coach Franz’s style of play was dubbed the “La Salle Press” and the “Pumaren Press”, I am now wondering if he’s ever going to stick with that play and adapt it in the PBA. And if ever he does, will it be as effective? Will it also give multiple championships to the young team? We’ll see, we’ll all see. I’m rooting for Shopinas btw since I’m a fan of coach Franz and his Press.
Here are the pictures with the designer's names.
This was a recipe that was in my Weight Watchers Weekly magazine...It was really good, not just for me, but the hubby and kids :) However, I think the peas kind of over powered the taste. Next time, peas on the side, not in the dish. It is worth 8 pts per serving.
-Learn more about birds and bird watching
Unfortunately, much of the plot is best kept secret, as there are great narrative moments which hinge entirely on the revelations encountered by Moon's solitary protagonist, Sam Bell (Sam Rockwell). Sam, bedraggled, lonely and infinitely bored, is just nearing the last two weeks of his three-year contract on the moon, where he manages an energy harvesting base station. It is the near future, and Lunar Industries has solved Earth's energy crisis with a new source of clean fuel: moon rock... or something. The details aren't important, as it's not the technology of Moon which is its point, it's its heroic quest for Sam (if you can call it that). After experiencing some hallucinations and mysterious blips in his days (pretty par for the course when it comes to lonely astronauts on film), Sam takes one of the cruisers out to check on a broken moon rock harvester... or whatever. On his way, he gets distracted by something and hits the harvester. He wakes up later, back in the lunar station's infirmary, and there begins his tumble down the rabbit hole.
I sit enchanted, by the fire,
Attack and defend for our children
The last scenes of Eastern strive for a similar family structure. At the water’s edge, right after tipping the balance of power and rescuing the baby at the center of the film’s conflict, Nikkolai (Viggo Mortensen) and Anna (Naomi Watts) share a kiss, the baby held closely between them. It’s another perfect picture of family unity, but here, with the reveal that Nikkolai’s character is more good guy than bad, it feels like a suture, like a triumph, and not the hollow victory at the end of Violence.
1tsp Peppercorns
How to Choose the Best Remote Wireless Speakers
Above: Determined Brooklyn newsies hang around the Brooklyn Navy Yard (at Sands Street) looking for potential buyers. 1903 Picture courtesy Shorpy
I'll look for sunshine beyond them
Got a random fact you want to share? Post it here.
Of any nation, if you were so inclined, you could dredge up a list of negatives designed to prick the bubble of patriotism but it's always easy to knock, to deride. Harder to stand up and sing your nation's praises. Though I am far away sipping juice from a fresh young coconut by a turquoise bay, I am still proud of my motherland, my England. Let's raise a coconut to St George, the slayer of dragons. Happy St George's Day Everyone!
The second week of May, that all disappears, and it’s as if there’s never been any Earth, or any sky, you’re in a brand new place, it’s your own universe. Everything begins to open up. Now this will happen on the planet, this will happen to world leaders, this will happen in the entertainment industry, and this will happen for individuals. There’s a shift happening that’s so subtle, and yet so powerful, and we start to feel it in May. It’s actually a consequence of flare ups in the sun that happened last month. Now this is not hocus-pocus. This is the new weather report.
9. I am a published poet (i.e. not self-published), in a real book, that was sold in Chapters bookstores across Canada. This was one of the life goals I set for myself and have completed.
Pu’er Tea: 95 to 100 ｰC (203 to 212 ｰF), Limitless
The three stories, when written, will all be posted on the same day, absolutely free of charge (which is as anti-American as you can get) on our author blogs.
20 Great Friends
Looking pretty good and this is just from taking the plastic bags out, lol.
Finally, I must rejoice at the Changing of the Pacifier. My oldest daughter called hers a "too-too." So that's what I think when I consider which face plug to insert in my son's mouth. First, there's the transparent green too-too that began its tenure in the hospital and allows full view of the inside of the child's mouth when you look straight at it. It's disturbing.
“Many producers will need to find alternative livelihoods.”
me- they're horrible. this is horrible. this is worse than the jon-ass brothers. there's not even a cute one.
The way out of town, back to our route, was not immediately apparent and a nice young man on a bike showed us the way to the right road and we were off again.
Ballast Point Brewing Company Victory At Sea Coffee Vanilla Imperial Porter
So, as I'm hitting my mail box button a message window pops up. Saying hi and asking how I am? I want to answer this friend, but know what I would have to say will not bring this friend a smile - this is not what he is looking for at this hour of the morning. So I stay mute - and then the tears start. The emptiness and loneliness invades me totally and I sit here sobbing, fighting hard to control my emotions.
B: Butterflies – did you know even if you touch the wing of a butterfly, it will never be able to fly again?
For better slideshows, try these sites:
The toxic long-term effects of aspartame are often dismissed as a hoax by the sweetener industry; however this new documentary thoroughly unravels something infinitely more alarming than merely a hoax.
The next post will feature how to paper piece the spikey arches.
The physicist: "The measurement wasn't accurate."
— Image quality: Please send the most color-balanced, evenly exposed, well-focused photographs you have; don’t use sharpener software. No screen grabs.
He lays on my belly and they place a blanket on us and a hat on his head. My midwife starts pushing on my tummy for the placenta to come out. A few minuets later she told me to give a small push, and out pops the placenta. She put it in a pink tub and shows it to me and describes it to us in detail. So cool. This organ nourished my baby for almost 40 weeks. Wow. God's design is so amazing.
*Discards: Also, my mom taught for 32 years and at the end of each year, the librarian and teachers who were changing grades or leaving would put loads of stuff they did not want on a table in the hall. If it wasn't picked up by the last day, it got thrown out. Get friendly with the school counselor or a teacher and let them know you are interested in discards. You never know what you might get (I got a huge room-sized rug, a filing shelving unit, several great games, a bunch of NICE play food and costumes, and a set of readers this year.)
Yet the article goes on to describe exasperated immigration officers pointing out members of vice syndicates handing over cash outside the NRD, as if they were “thumbing their noses at the authorities, mocking and taunting them.” Their hands, they say, are tied. They must, they say, approve the visas anyway.
This year when I got the announcement that reservations for the pitch sessions at the RT con were opening up, I simply chuckled as I deleted the email. At the con itself, I didn’t even step foot in the pitch areas to ogle the agents and editors in attendance. My obsession with all things trad publishing was effectively cured. Not that I wouldn’t accept the right trad deal should one come around, but my days of stalking such a contract seem to be over.
Here's my plate of food: a tamale with a spicy chipotle tomato sauce I made to serve with the tamales, some salad and a rice paper roll with mango sauce that Belinda made.
fallow and forgotten,
Luckily with a little pin pricking and a lot of pulling, the bodice went on, though not before the girl had a squeeze of my comparably ample chest and said “La-aw na”: very good. The beautiful matching sarong took a while to put together and I was really mesmerised by the skill involved in tying it and creating a ruffle effect on the front.
Yesterday I wanted to keep it devoted to Mother's Day so I am posting my normal hodge podge Sunday recap on Monday!
Oddly the Gold wasn't drowned by the Ardrahan. I found the two flavour profiles kept to their respective corners and I got the best of both simultaneously. I guess that's a win. The same can't be said for the IPA: becoming the first of the beers to triumph over the cheese flavour altogether, and that's not a good thing with something as complex as Ardrahan. The reverse happens with the Red: the cream and butter flavours just wreck the beer. It seems that this cheese is a tough one to get the measure of: I think it merits further beer-related investigations. Something with serious hops would be interesting.
The Hermitage painting is large; a small procession of Joseph, Mary and the child on an ass, led by an adolescent girl through a wooded Italianate countryside, in which a deer, a fox, a hawk, some sheep and a cow appear. The Titian colours are there; the Virgin’s dress appears to be pink silk or velvet. and Joseph’s cloak a lustrous yellow. Only the colours suggest Titian to me; I would not have thought of him first, perhaps because of the girl leading the ass, whose square build is unlike any Titian I have seen. The girl for me is the main focus of the picture.
See what I did right there? I lowered your expectations. Now, when you read it you’ll be like, “Hey, that wasn’t terrible. It was even kinda good.” I’ll be happy and you'll have no idea you just read a really awful, terrible, no good, very bad book.
“Extra cheese OK with you G?” Piper said as Marley washed.
So I'm excited to try this.
Curator: Karen Paris.
Well here is the evidence of this tactic being used in Bersih 3.0 and this is coming out from the horse’s mouth itself. Zaharin – Setiausaha UMNO Bandar tun razak .
Tara Wagner is a mother and a lover, a writer and an organic life coach, specializing in life learning, organic parenting and authentic living. She currently travels the US with her husband and son in a truck converted to run on veggie oil and a solar-powered RV. You can find her blogging at TheOrganicSister.com and SustainableBabySteps.com.
This is the beginning… the first set of questions to think about.
Another person I’ll talk to is the lady on my right. About four years ago, we began carpooling together, and to get that started we had to verbally agree on times, meeting places, reimbursements, etc. (This was during that brief period when formal hand-written letters had become passé and texting had yet to reach its full potential, so we just spoke).
Travelling back in time, we meet those 13 Men, those men who believed that the Lord was the Messiah. The truth of the story is that they did not always believe in Him but eventually they left a legacy behind them: the legacy of faith; the journey of faith; the moments that they believed; they doubted, and they believed again.
This economic pressure brings an unhealthy pressure on newsrooms to find an audience through any means, including hype. For television news, this means packaging dramatic reports timed for the Nielsen sweeps, while spending significant sums on radio and billboard advertising aimed at getting viewers tuned in just in time to be counted.
All around
Cue the jealous band who call themselves, 'Slutmaster,' but the three members' sexual conquests combined don't equal a trip to third base. They think they are Raptor Snatch's rivals, and will stab them in the fronts every chance they get.
When I’m back on my laptop, I’ll send you some pics from Memphis in Aug if you want ..
And then I would go through periods of hardly-any-writing, which I guess is not as bad as no-writing-at-all days. As of yesterday, I hit the big 40K, which means I have the rest of the month to come up with 10K words.
Yeah. So, know why I was doing all that?
There’s a gadget for people who do not want to use traditional bookmarks. It’s called the PageKeeper® and it slides onto the back cover of whatever book you’re reading and has a thin metal extension that keeps track of the page you’re on as you read through the book. When you need to put the book down to answer the phone or some other task, the device automatically remains on the last page you’ve been reading. It is the clever invention of Scott Capamaggio, founder of The Piedmont Group, located in Greensboro, NC. If you want to ensure you will never lose your place again, check it out at www.PageKeeper.com.
Final Message.
Ø But: Negates any words that are stated before it.
“Send my apologies to Mr Bananas because I won’t be able to visit him any time soon,” he said. “I’m having a bit of a domestic crisis at the moment which needs sorting.”
What do you normally do; more talking or more listening? Many people today in the world they tend to talk more than they listen. Did you know that less listening and learning increases the slow-down of your personal growth? Whether you believe it or not, its the truth. Speaking from personal experience I used to talk a lot more than I actually listened and learned. I used to speak in public, in churches, and I sounded good, I’m sure I’ve helped a lot of people through my talking as well but the real question I want to ask myself is did I speak with power? Did I speak with full understanding of the topics that I was talking about? To be honest with you, I probably wasn’t. Throughout time I have noticed this truth when I started realizing that I live in a multi-dimensional world. The world that consists of so many elements that a lot of us are not even aware of. That realization made me learn step by step how to LISTEN. When I started listening I have noticed that I spoke very rarely but WITH POWER. Now, I’m not trying to sound weird by saying that you should not talk much or anything like that; I’m just emphasizing that when you learn things in this world and you observe everything with careful attitude you start understanding things other people don’t. When you’ll start doing that you will notice that when you’re sitting in a group of friends or co-workers talking about a certain topic, you will say one sentence that will top and solve everything they were just talking about in a very powerful way.When you are filled with power of righteous understanding and you use it with CONFIDENCE, I guarantee you that other people will be influenced by you in a very massive way. Confidence is contagious. Its up to you what level of power to live on, make a difference through your thoughts, words and actions.
"Then you only have yourself to blame and I'm sorry for that. We'll send it to her or your aunt and you can use it when you visit them."
So… go fix one broken rule this week.
Half way through the gig, Tashian announced they had worked up a cover version, and launched into an upbeat rendition of Daydream Believer, accompanied lustily by the audience, in commemoration of the Mancunian Davy Jones. A perfect choice.
In Friendster, one can create a blog account. But some of my contacts’ blogs are “copy and paste”! (Most don’t attribute sources.)
Yes. The local neds found our kitchen window too much of a target to ignore, had idle hands and just had to test out their snowball flinging abilities.
"Orangish?" I inquired, rolling my eyes. "Hmm, I wonder what breed that could be?"
5) Are you totally open, ready and willing to get it go?
6) Shallots, 5 pcs, cut into thin slices
For the card design, I`ve followed this sketch at Card Patterns. The DP is an older line from My Mind`s Eye, and the card blank in behind has been sponged in with DI.
6. Born to Lose
There is a solution and it is available now. Please, if you have a university-bound student, listen carefully. This is important even if your child is going to a “safe” college (some so-called “Christian” colleges and seminaries are actually better at convincing children to walk away from their Faith than some secular colleges).
We know this only because Washington D.C.’s conservative newspaper , the Washington Times, got ahold of the court documents before the government suddenly made them off limits. The now-sealed federal grand jury indictment tells the frightening story of how Terry was gunned down by Mexican drug smugglers patrolling the rugged desert with the intent to “intentionally and forcibly assault” Border Patrol agents.
-scheduling time and walking and taking the bus
Novelette
Against this backdrop, it is difficult for medical humanitarian organisations to expand health services and have an impact. MSF has been working in Somalia for two decades and has projects in nine locations on both sides of the frontlines. We already have more than 8,000 acutely malnourished children in our feeding programmes. But all four of the children I met who made it from Lower Shebelle have measles in addition to malnutrition. They live with thousands of other displaced people in crowded, unsanitary conditions. Others from these camps complain of skin and eye infections, watery diarrhoea and respiratory tract infections. Some are too weak even to seek food or healthcare.
Preheat oven to 400º. Spread out the almonds on a baking pan. Sprinkle the cinnamon over the almonds and stir to combine. Toast for 15 minutes, stirring every 5 minutes. Cool before eating or storing. I put mine in a little jar and they are retaining their cinnamon flavor nicely.
We usually accept those phenomena as mere entertainment, but to me, what it really highlights is the power of the human brain and how the way it functions can distort reality in several ways. With that in mind, can we begin to understand how religious people, who have been so heavily indoctrinated about Gods, demons, heaven, hell, and other religious beliefs, could claim to have had supernatural experiences? Think of the following:
think, I want the old dark
5. Alliance in tyranny
The bowling bird toy is easy to install with a plastic nut that holds the toy secure. It’s easy to move the bowling alley; I moved it three times to find a spot to the birds’ liking.
“Well, I guessed as much and had made it clear to the dealer not to mention my name when I requested it.”
Hence the cult - and I use the word with no suggestion at all of slight or condescension - of our remaining First World War veterans, old men now, most of them well over a hundred, who are, I suspect, rather bemused, that in these last years of a life of ordinary works and days that till now went unnoticed, as most lives do, to find themselves the subject of national interest and large and general affection. For some of them, there is embarrassment in the fact that their actual deeds in the war were undistinguished. They feel, some of them, that the aura they have acquired belongs to other and braver men. Their achievement is survival itself.
Just because you make me smile, it doesn’t give you the right to make me feel alright but you do.
Sibling rivalry leads Romulus to slay his brother and become the first king and founder of the city of Rome.
Sure, I replied. After all, mi pollo es su pollo.
My package to Cecile:
It appears that wearing new clothes at Easter is an old one. The newly baptized would wear white clothing throughout the entire Easter Week as a symbol that the waters of their baptism had cleansed them from all sin. Other Christians would dress in new clothing to show that they, too, had risen to a new life in Christ. This became an outward sign of one's faith and participation in the dying and rising of Our Lord.
Yes, there must be balance. Only you can decide what that balance is. But don't let fear or guilt or anything else get in the way of the deepest yearnings of your heart. You can do this. You should do this. No, get out there and do it!
The team was formally organized I think two years ago. Originally composed of rival collegiate players, the management decided to hire Rajko Toroman, the former head coach of the Iranian National team, as its head mentor. The decision to tap the talent of collegiate level players was pretty bold for two reasons. First, most of the former Philippine national teams were always spearheaded by professional basketball stars, that are also veterans in international competition. And secondly, as previously mentioned, the players are fresh out of college, from rival and competing schools. I was thinking back then that it would be hard to form a cohesive unit from a group of players that were battling each other out a few months back for school pride and supremacy. Good thing I was wrong. With a good basketball program and training regimens, the team management was able to to form a formidable squad, with the talent and potential of each player maximized. The management was also aware that if the team was to make it big in the international scene, they should be exposed to the playing field outside of the Philippines. So for two straight years, the national team joined different basketball leagues around the world, with the players familiarizing themselves to the different playing styles abroad while at the same time garnering priceless experience that should help them in their bid for basketball supremacy.
Mark the back of the button where you want the post. Experiment with different positions until you have the look you like. Where you glue the post may vary depending on whether you use findings for clip on versus pierced earrings.
Keep an idea notebook with you as much as possible, you never know when inspiration will strike!
Seeing Mom's handwriting made me miss her all over again. I sat on my floor and read her beautiful words over and over as tears streamed down my face. Today I can read them with just tears welling up in my eyes. There was no one like my mom. No one will ever be able to replace her or fill that void that has been there since the day she passed away. The same goes for my dad. I talked to my brother Pat tonight and he reminded me of a saying Dad used to say, which made me smile to think it. Pat said it to his daughter earlier tonight.
Are you drooling yet??? Yeah, sorry about that. But I really think you have to make these, because they’re just so darned easy and also freaking delicious. You know, I don’t really understand how there are so many cupcake shops that stay in business. But I guess it’s probably because there are a lot of bad cupcake recipes online and that scares people off. So if you’ve had some less than amazing cupcakes, please do yourself a favor and make these. There is no fancy machinery required, they’re extraordinarily stunning, and also the best cupcakes my husband and I have ever had.
Some other conditions that are related to chest pain in young women include vulvular heart disease, mitral prolapse, rheumatic heart disease, mitral slenosis, angina etc. Pulmonary embolism, which is caused by blood clots in the major blood vessels that carry blood to the lungs, can produce chest pain. Pneumothorax, esophageal reflux and costochondritis can also be responsible for causing chest pain. It has been observed that chest pain in women can also arise from stress and anxiety.
How do they know that we need to perceive to think?
Comcast and NBC/Disney are two of the largest media conglomerates in the world. One creates and broadcasts the media – the other controls the equipment and digital airwaves to turn these broadcasts into the degrading entertainment and propaganda we see in our homes and at movie theatres, that we hear on the radio, and that we read in magazines, newspapers and digitally on our computers. Most people wont think anything of this merger and others like it that are constantly happening on a smaller scale; perhaps second-handedly recalling from an outdated textbook, the chapter on monopolies and anti-trust laws. Thinking about such things has, through the same media we are talking about here, been trumped by the reality show, celebrity lifestyles and deaths, “news entertainment” shows, and indoctrinating and manipulative sitcoms and movies – which have dumbed us down to the extent of actually believing that what happens on “Law and Order” is the reality of what actually happens in the law enforcement and criminal justice system. I assure you, this is not the case. Hospital shows are not accurate portrayals of how hospitals are actually run, and are not representative of the real state of the healthcare system. Police and detective shows are so far removed from reality that I laugh out loud at the ridiculous portrayal of “the system”.
WAITER: And how would you like the filet mignon?
Because you see.....this is the house....
I have personally noticed the change in some people who I know personally and its ugly in my sight, instead of transforming from a caterpillar to a butterfly they’ve changed to a moth resembling a butterfly, duller in color and being active only at night. Butterflies are birthed from out of a cocoon the struggle is what makes them beautiful. A butterfly goes from flower to flower making that flower more beautiful and noticeable, they leave little butterfly kisses on each flower, butterflies are quiet and make their way around a garden of field beautifying everything it touches, butterflies also make you watch them in awesome wonder.
The hardest part was actually waiting. Amazon does not ship for free here in the Philippines, so I had to cook up some inexpensive way to get them to me. With the help of one of my Dad’s good friends in California, and a ginormous balikbayan shipping box, I was set. Little did I know that when you send your package via a budget route, it takes nearly forever. It took about 2 months for this package to get to me, but it was so worth the wait! Opening the box felt like I was about to open a magic door. I had my face of wonderment on; all that was missing were the rays of golden light, and possibly a unicorn jumping out from some magical place within.
WHOA! Holy CANNOLI!! WAIT. Leave the Cannoli, bring the gun! The protagonists are the FBI guys?
8) Chinese Cooking Wine – Shao Shing Chiew (Optional - Non Halal)
The palate was quite sweet and easy drinking, but somewhat strange with really good acidity, but a mouthwash-like menthol flavour.
Ever have someone in your life (besides your dog) who was always glad to see you or hear from you? Who made you feel like the most special, most wanted person in the world? That’s my Peter.
These incidents occurred from early February 2011 and continued until early July 2011, according to the indictment.
○ Karl’s Back Room – Extended
Concentration on the present, which gives the title to the book of interviews of Hadot’s entitled The Present Alone is our Happiness, helps us to see that it is the ‘thickness’ of the present, which is to say, the presence within it of the past and future, which are the cause of most of our suffering. Worries about the future, regrets about the past, these pulls yank us out of the present, divert our focus on where we are right here and now. But for Hadot, and many Ancient schools before him, the present has all we need to be happy. Hadot particularly emphasizes the way this played out in “Stoic virtue” and “Epicurean joy.” As will become clear, the second and third exersices flow naturally from this first, and in different flavors for Stoicism, Epicureanism, and Buddhism, in ways I’ll address now in turn.
Tim Tebow
Road trip! Planned a little last-minute vaca. Can't wait to spend the time and feel the freedom.
Up Above
Opera House. Harbour Bridge. Barangaroo. Randwick. St Mary’s Cathedral.
It seems that we’re being given unhelpfully contradictory clues scattered throughout the complete text, and are left with the challenge of fitting the pieces together ourselves into some sort of coherent structure, requiring an excessively generous dose of deductive logic to do so. It might not be irreconcilable, but it doesn’t help your case when you need to work from the assumption that everything you’re reading is true, and then make stuff up to keep this assumption feasible.
When I was quite a young girl, Grandfather Edgar had the idea to fit a supercharger to a 500cc Blackburne engine he had somehow acquired, and for which he was building a frame to take part in sprint events. I remember he had purchased a Shorrock unit but wasn't quite sure about ratios and mixtures and so on. "I need help to get a blow job, Camilla," he would say, laughing away in that deep rumble of his. I didn't then know how rude that was - not the thing to say to a young girl, but that was Grandad!
Only moving forward, dahling, never backwards,
Holly: Who knows, I might write more about that one of these days. ;-)
Me : “No… 40″
Happy searching, and even better, happy reading.
But I’ve realized it can no longer be that way.
On the wall below the name of the museum, it reads “Using Objects of Intolerance to Teach Tolerance and Promote Social Justice.” As the museum demonstrates, we have a history of racial injustice, and we continue to live in a racially divisive society. The examples are still everywhere. Read the comments about nearly anything relating to President Obama or scroll to the comments section of any online story even remotely referring to race and you are sure to be appalled. In fact, I just read an article today about the hate spilled out toward Joel Ward, the hockey player who scored the winning goal in overtime of game 7 to lead the Washington Capitals over the Boston Bruins, because he is black. However, if we remain solely focused on what is wrong, we lose sight of the true mission of the Civil Rights Movement and of institutions like the Jim Crow Museum. We need to reach out to one another to promote love and acceptance for all, and I truly mean all. This post and the museum are dedicated to discussions of race but they also open the doors to working to overcome all forms of discrimination, stereotyping, and intolerance. One day, hopefully we will be able to actually love all our neighbors as God loves us and live in the type of society that Dr. King dreamed about. Here’s hoping and praying that we can work toward that end.
Catherine Porter is Co-Founder/Artistic Director of the OBIE-winning Peculiar Works Project, and has performed Off and Off-Off Broadway with myriad companies. She is Development Director for Dixon Place, and is on the board of A.R.T./New York and Concrete Temple. She was named one of nytheatre.com’s 2010 People of the Year.
As the dramatic and eye-catching movie poster tells us, the protagonist, played by Tom Neal, searched for love in all the wrong places. Looked for love in too many faces. Etc. A series of fateful hitchhiking encounters while on his way to find his gal (and former girl singer in his dance hall band) led him straight into a typical noir sh*tstorm, or detour from his plans, if you will. "I Can't Believe You're in Love with Me" serves as an aural reminder to the main character (and movie viewer) of the love lost.
by George Orwell
8. Ken Babbs and harmonica
There are a few classes that still have a little room so we thought we would show you where we have openings and you might decide you want to join in the fun!
03. The Black Page #2 (7:03)
If you have already read Manchester 6 I urge you to write a review on Amazon, Goodreads and your blog.
can not protect your family pride…
“The Gods of Mars” by Edgar Rice Burroughs – I enjoyed the first book in the series, and I can’t wait to see John Carter reunite with Dejah Thoris!
Now put it down again.
02 Anything that's Rock 'n' Roll
In the Cathedral, we were lucky enough to join a tour given by one of the trainee guides. Jessica was a breath of fresh air! Don’t get me wrong, I can listen to older people telling stories for hours on end and love their worldly wisdom, but there was something special about a funky woman in her 20s leading a church tour. Loved the stories of kangaroos on the cathedra and the ‘Derbyshire squiggles’ on the floor (to find out more, go there yourself, or wait for our book due out about a year from now…).
I can't remember the name of the place I took this picture from. The bus took us up the hill and after that we had some time to look around and take pictures. The view of the city from here was just amazing!
hands in your pockets, she is protective and wary.
These and like sayings have had to be fulfilled by many kings and great princes, from the beginning to the present day. They have become examples, though they had God’s commandment and authority and right.
Frankly, the world would be better off with the conversationalist zombies.
“So they already have abstinence-only education, their teen sex rate is still higher than average, and their answer to this problem is to reduce what little their teens can be taught about anything peripheral of sex?” says Samurai Cathy. “So if this doesn’t work, what’s next? Not telling children how to go to the bathroom for fear they will touch their own genitals?”
In terms of the relationship, it differs from client to client. Most people who ask for an editorial assessment of their work come back to me when it is revised to check they have done it properly. Still others ask for advice in getting an agent via the ARS, and then in managing multiple-interest from agents and publishers. I keep my Smart Quill work very separate from my day job, which is important for clarity. I work at the beginning of the writing process whereas as an editor I will work at the end. But the quality of editing I give Smart Quill clients is exactly the same as that I give to published authors.
7. Jesus is the Fullness of God.
Yesterday, Wednesday, was the last day before the wedding Merri and I will go to the gym together. There seem to be a number of "last" times these days. Her last day at PSU was Tuesday. My husband, Keith celebrated by taking her and picking her up from school. It reminds me that even good change is a loss of sorts and bittersweet. The good part about these kind of "lasts" is they're followed by "firsts." So in the midst of changes and the upcoming empty nest phase, we are busy getting ready for the big day.
Repeat rows 1 and 2 until your scarf is as wide as you like it.
1 1/2 lbs of beef tips
The call of the Gospel isn't a call for membership in a church, but rather partnership in a movement. Active, not passive.
A simple possible sequence:
I already contacted dclives and we’re planning to do Zutto Shiawase na Kiss in this format.
The last month has brought me closer to God than I ever thought possible. Every day I am reminded of how much I need Him. And thankfully, every day He shows up.
The Time Machine is a dark science fiction fantasy film based on the 1895 H.G. Wells novel about a Victorian-aged inventor who travels into the near and then distant future to discover that mankind is continually ravaged by war. Upon discovering a seemingly peaceful world far into the distant future, George discovers the truth about a post-apocalyptic age that suffered horrific evolutionary consequences as a result of war. As a cautionary tale, The Time Machine was a visionary story in a pre-atomic age which is masterfully put to film in what is perhaps the most memorable adaptation of this intriguing and highly influential story (Klaus Ming April 2012).
Todd breathed deeply, as if restraining himself from clobbering me, and wiped the sweat off his face.
Sword making is an art as much as a manufacturing process. A good sword has several elements that vary depending on the type of sword being made, but they all have to have a certain hardness, flexibility, strength, and balance. No sword is exactly like another, even a sword maker has built-in variation to his designs. The metal is heated and cooled, carved and shaped. Depending on the weapon being made the technique will change. Some are huge, heavy, weapons. Others are small, sharp, and easily hidden.
Miracle on 34th Street (1994) ... FMC ... 8 PM
These women are super talented and I am so glad they
Personally, I could wish that he was right about this Rapture thing. That he, and all those that believe his rantings had been be swept up and taken out of this world in the blink of a eye today. Let God have the crazies, we've been dealing with them long enough. That would finally shut them up at least. Might have even opened up the job market a bit so I could find a job.
Exkaiser and Iczer(click for more)
Just look at my “Friendfeed” badge on my blogs or pages, and see how many social networks and blogs I am on. There’s a reason for that. This is the world I was born to live in, the world I thought I was living in when I pitched my first story at that poor-unsuspecting-towering-icon-of-the-SF-Field, and he bought it.
There is absolutely no contact between clients until Marie and Nancy set up the first date. This personalized service is not cheap. Male clients pay a $6,500 fee and are responsible for paying all expenses incurred on dates. Female clients pay $250. Playing to their strengths, Malis focuses on selecting and coaching the women, while McIllwrath seeks out and coaches the men.
This was the Chilean version of Empanadas but one of the mom said that she knows Venezuelan version of Empanadas so we will try that sometime.
There’s a lot to say about the film, and I have probably exceeded your patience. So, watch it.
June 2006 - April 2007: Hawaii
She looked up at me, smiled, and continued the conversation with herself. However at one point, one of the things she said was "I love you too."
1t brown sugar
-- Shadow Medallion Quest
There is a lesser known story regarding trapped miners that was also in the news recently. A group of 276 men were working in a mine in central China when the mine suffered a gas leak. 239 made it out safely. 26 were found dead. But 11 men were missing, and no one knew whether they were dead or alive. Then, after a couple of days, these 11 unfortunate men were found to be dead.
The TTC is working with Pattison One in putting up digital signs on the platform. In most stations there is one per direction. In other stations there are two and in a few there are three. These are mostly an ad/news feed system with about the bottom 1/4 (maybe even 1/5) dedicated to TTC information. That information consists of next train arrival, delays, bus routes modifications, etc. The bulk of the display is taken up with, as mentioned, ads and news feeds. Although interesting, and a source of revenue for the TTC, they could be better used as pure information about the TTC. And there should be a minimum of three per station and for the busier platforms, five.
I believe this can also be approached from the intention to respect: to suspend your beliefs, to decide to assume that another way may be better than yours, and just to explore what that might mean. This is also an intention to develop your relationship with another person.
Research Station, 2,8/21 Distagon T* 1/200sec at f/5.6.
Circumstances conspired to stop me buying a copy of the book: the UK cover isn't nearly so appealing as the one in the post below, and the women from the bookshop that were selling it couldn't be bothered to get their debit/credit card machine from the car: "There's a cash point just outside." One of them said.
– Big Country Atlantic: UAB, FIU, East Carolina, Marshall, Temple, Massachusetts
And then there’s the matter of the Boston Red Sox suddenly having a case of amnesia and thinking they’re the Chicago Cubs. Ah, well, I got to see the Sox win two Series championships in my life…I’m good for another 86 years.
Thank you ever so much to Allan and Bonnie for being so patient with me and for agreeing to this interview! I hugely enjoyed reading through Allan's answers - I hope you did too! For more information about the Zan Gah series, visit the official site.
I've had some fun lampies in my stash and finally got around to some stringing time.
A quirky, smart, charming page-turner, Horten's Miraculous Mechanisms will enchant young readers--as well as teachers, librarians, and parents.
After the race, the bikes get loaded back on the van, the riders get back in the van, and I drive back to the host housing. No hotels this trip, we're guests of some wonderful people (and amateur wine makers!!) in the town of Stillwater, MN. Back at the house, the bikes get loaded back into the trailer for the night. Tomorrow it starts again, though there is a little more to do since there was some bike-damage by the road conditions during the race. One rider crashed, two bikes suffered race-related damage. All the wheels need checking...
Jn 15:11 These things have I spoken to you, that My joy might remain in you, and that your joy might be full.
Make the bed - Pretty self explanatory. An unmade bed makes any room look messy.
rushing around getting washed and dressed and I was ready when Erica and
http://www.adrive.com/- gives you 50GB of free storage. Need Java in order to upload. It’s clunky and you cannot collaborate with it, but it is good for just backing up your computer.
But when Home and Garden Television entered the scene I was in heaven. I could not wait to watch the next design show. My husband got tired of my constant reference to "what they do on HGTV" and all the hogging of the television to watch "just one more show"
When in Rome, you will quickly realize that the endless stream of smarts, scooters, buses and cars don’t stop for pedestrians not even at zebra crossings and so the task of crossing the street is probably the scariest thing that will happen to you there. But it turns out there is a trick to it and although cars wont stop for you they will slow down and adjust their route for you.
This fun card was created with the Cut Borders technique from the April-May 2012 TJ newsletter.
Mud streak clang blade, mucky corduroys,
on the flat screen. And then there it is, that
The interesting thing was that the listing was in my old hometown in upstate NY. I live 11 hours away, but....but....surely there had to be a way to get her if she was what I was looking for, right?
thousands of
together (only less academic and sterile than his hybridology tends
What you are, you are by accident of birth;
Damien Riggs draws our attention to the often-ignored racial dimensions of the national conversation.
Take heart: I don’t cite authority lightly,
c. Nirvana
13 used
Something Like Love
In Mexico an Eagle, and a Lion in Peru;
Have a great day or evening!
Curitiba, Brazil
I feel I have learned some things from last year that will help me this year. I planted the rows facing down the hill so the garden can drain better. I made little drainage areas on each side of the row that is lower than the plant so the garden can drain. My tomatoes didn't do well in the garden last year at all, that is why I am growing them in pots on my deck instead. I did more herbs this year than last because I use a lot of them to cook with. Here's hopes to a successful garden this year!
How to get there: Manningtree is on the line between London and Ipswich/Norwich, served by direct NXEA trains from Liverpool Street, taking around an hour either way.
I suffer from *CHAOS,* you know,
Not literally with sex itself, but with the idea of it.
A mobile court of Rapid Action Battalion (RAB) has fined a food processing firm for adulterating cheese at the city's Jatrabari.
So let's bake a cake and forget about our kids growing up and leaving us for a minute ...one recipe of white vanilla cake batter, six 6-inch round cake pans, 6 jars of gel food coloring in the colors of the rainbow. It's beautiful and makes a huge impact - the oohs and aahs you hear when you pull out that first slice!
After eleven long years, Geoff Barrow and company finally released their third excursion into the depths of trip-hop. Bearing influences as diverse as Edith Piaf and Silver Apples, the album (simply titled Third) did its best to make sense of an electronic landscape that had been transformed by the likes of DJ Shadow and Radiohead. Its crackling industrial moments bore little similarity to the lethargic Portishead of old, but the band's trademark gloomy romanticism (courtesy of lyricist/siren Beth Gibbons) remained prominent. Portishead's return to the fray may have met some expectations while dashing others, but after such a long absence, a completely satisfactory product might well have been impossible. When all was said and done, it was nice just to have them back.
1. He never cut His hair,
so our household as been complete chaos for a few weeks.
He is 7th generation of the famous
Though I should warn the rest of the band before I do these stunts, the bass player nearly had a stroke! Spontaneity eh? Ya can't really plan for it. I wonder about meself sometimes, but only sometimes. Rest of the time I'm havin' the craic and makin' folk smile!
Date: Thursday, May 3, 2012
When students at the university finish their exams, their friends meet them outside the exam halls and 'trash' them. Trashing involves the hurling of food, confetti, glitter, silly string, champagne (for the rich), beer (for the poor) and anything else that can be hurled over the exam-sitter who is, as the university demands, dressed in sub fusc and gown. (Sub fusc is a monochrome formal outfit with some arcane bits and pieces; a gown is a cut-down version of a real academic gown, with silly tatters in place of sleeves - except for scholars, who have better sleevelets.) You can see obvious objections to this - there's a lot of mess and someone has to clear it up, for a start. It disrupts the traffic (very briefly). But it is, basically, harmless fun.
Both models will be powered by two GE Passport turbofan engines, now under development; the powerplant is rated at 16,500 lb. thrust. The aircraft will also feature Bombardier’s new Vision Flight Deck, which will include an LCD head-up display, enhanced and synthetic vision systems, electronic flight bags, and RNP 0.1 capability, and any other advances that become available.
While there are certainly aspects of digital advertising and marketing that present fascinating new opportunities, our most militant digital advertising advocates make the most cocksure assertions with a minimum of evidence; they are either reluctant to or incapable of verifying their assertions with reliable data; and when data that repudiates their assertions are presented they often respond with ad hominem attacks.
Everything is in the undecided box at the moment. The unkown of what will happen and the unsure of what is around the corner. So no life plans today.
They clearly don't think it's necessary to tell us what a turnkey solution is, so I checked with Wisegeek (much plagiarised by students, I note in passing) where I am told that a turnkey solution is "a solution that can easily be implemented based on the resources already at the disposal of a company or individual." I'm not sure that gets me much further, but maybe it means that ProLicht will make you some signs that you can
Paper and cardstock - Dovecraft and Hobbycraft
Political views: Wong (left) expressing his opinions to Yong whom he hopes to stay on and contest in the coming parliamentary elections.
Mastic is hardened drops of sap from a type of evergreen bush called the lentisk tree found only in certain parts of Chios. The resinous nuggets are the original chewing gum. The name "mastiha" or mastic is the root word of "masticate" meaning "to chew."
which I should have in my hot little hands tonight, although,
1 trudged
Story 1
Total Weight Loss: 88.8lbs
“Okay,” Meg agreed. “But we have to come right back, we can’t just leave this here for anyone to find.”
Micheletto goes right to the Vatican, where he meets with Cesare and tells him what’s been going on. Cesare asks if della Rovere has evidence of this lechery, and Micheletto tells him della Rovere means to find it. Cesare suggests they find it first.
No Sunday morning hangovers for us! We set out for Barataria Preserve, a short drive south of New Orleans to satisfy my pull to the swamps. Like Brazos Bend, this park offers incredible diversity. Here we saw songbirds, anole lizards, alligators, and fat, fuzzy caterpillars (I think that’s what they were). We took the ranger tour at 10AM and I became very aware of how fragile the land in the preserve is. An oil line runs through the park and every hurricane or storm brings foreign soil or potent fertilizer that affects the plant life. Since Hurricane Katrina, blackberry plants have entered the swamp and (if I remember correctly) an influx of salt water has dramatically reduced the famous wild blue irises. The warm winter this year also promoted clogged waterways, so canoeing is out and the mosquitoes are in.
We are calling this piece "Tra-La-La". Mom came up with the name and the design. I had one design idea but mom didn't think it would be stable enough. I wanted to use the vines as a focal pendant but we couldn't think of a way to make it stable and durable. Mom came up with the idea of using the trellis squares and flowers for the necklace.
Assassin - Bam Bam
This park protects 794,000 acres where the Mojave and Colorado deserts converge. Roadrunners to Quail to Cactus Wrens. Bighorn Sheep to Desert Tortoise to Rattlesnake. Joshua Trees to Cacti to Piled Rocks.
like a spring walk at the river
We started feeding you a few months ago and you LOVE food. If you don't eat immediately upon being set into your chair you start to grunt and whine because you don't like to wait. You've eaten everything from chicken to refried beans to avocado to mangoes. Your appetite seems to know no bounds... although you're not the biggest fan of peas. I guess you take after Mommy in that department.
Add sugar and continue for about 4 minutes then add the egg and vanilla and continue until mixed. Add sifted dry ingredients to the butter mixture on low speed just until combined. Wrap dough in plastic wrap in flattened disks and refrigerate until chilled (at least 1 hour).Preheat oven to 325.
When you discover what it means for the Holy Spirit to be active in your life, you experience a power greater than anything else. The power from a hydroelectric dam can light up a city. But the power of the Holy Spirit touches eternity itself. Unfortunately, to most people, this power is just as hidden and mysterious as Victoria Falls in the days before Livingstone.
At least I wasn’t alone. One of the other male teachers, a guy around the same age as myself, had to dress up and wear lipstick as well. Only his attire resembles that of an ajossi pimp. He would be pulling a cart in the giant circle opposite from mine that the opposing team of sixth graders would be tossing beanbags into.
Sometimes I feel as if my whole world were inside an owl's wing... muffled, soft, white, and slightly blurred. The fine snow sifts down from white skies onto an ever-whiter earth, traced and divided by the charcoal strokes of trunks, branches, twigs. There is a restfulness, stillness, and peacefulness in winter that doesn't exist in quite the same way during any other season. It is as though my whole world is breathing quietly ...and dreaming. Snow is without prejudice ... it wraps itself lovingly around everything it encounters, and enfolded in its pristine billows and swirls, we are all equal.
Nobody likes a snitch. Not even the teachers.
will slide
It's said that eating Padrón peppers is like a game of Russian roulette - you never know if the next one will be the hot one. It's been a couple of years since I last posted about them and interestingly enough, they were the subject of a WHB posting and that time I made what is probably the easiest and most classic tapas dish - fried Padrón peppers.
Love to all,
My next project was inspired by my friend Cassie. She has recently been making buntings out of vintage fabric (and since I'm a total copy cat, I had to give it a try). I found a vintage sheet at the thrift store for $.75. After washing it in scalding hot water, ha ha, I cut it in to triangles and gave it a whirl. Here is the debut of my first ever sewn bunting!!!
Gingelly oil- 3 tbsp
“The back image that accompanies the campaign is fundamental to the political message we aim to get across. A play on words, one might imagine it as though the women are literally turning their back on the camera, refusing to be treated like sexual objects; the symbol embodying the slogan.
Novoselic
Note: When Gillian talks about shows she had seen as a spectator at The Catalyst (track 6 of the first set), she is referring to the time when she had lived in Santa Cruz
2. What percentage of the respondents listen to Pandora (round to one decimal point)?
74. I’ve got a thirst baby, and you smell like my Gatoraid!
The moment was so surreal and precious and overwhelming.
All that’s left is my reflection and I stare
safe from harm -- not only for the sake of his
In the UK, we have seen how the Metropolitan Police have cracked down on the criminal elements of student unrest in London. Should not the Egyptian authorities be encouraged to follow their example?
Damn skippy. Not when it comes to getting my head knocked in. Or anybody else's for that matter. I only got one head and even if it aint so pretty, I'm kind of stuck with it.
I'm still reading, though my reviews have been few and far between. To make up for it I offer you two:
10. When I was a kid I thought the following statement was hilarious: I thought it was a booger, but its snot... Yep, still do.
General comment: A stunning whisky that reminds me somewhat of Hibiki 21. Complex and faultless.
Whatever we are experiencing in the present moment is both the fruition of our previous karma and the planting of seeds for future karma. The circumstances we encounter are our karma, are the expression of our consciousness, are the seeds of our future. We are in a great hologram of karma, and our lives reflect the intersection of our family or genealogical karma, the collective karma of our culture and, in many cases, a particular set of karmas that is expressed through the teachers and communities we encounter on the spiritual journey.
the one I sense tension with,
But I'm with you always
This monument to guilt and repression contrasts sharply with the sprit of light and openess that consitutes the building that I’ll call N°21 (Does it have a name? Did it ever have a name?). What strikes you first is a feeling of space and airiness. The centre of Paris can be a claustrophobic experience, with narrow streets being flanked on both sides by uniform buildings that practically touch the road. The intention here though was clearly to take a step back from the street and open the building up to the visitor or passer by. You can actually see the sky here and take a deep breath, something that would probably be a good idea given the amount of greenery that has been incorporated into the design.
So, girls out there that are unsatisfied with their shape… Remember that if you are destroying your body, you’re also harming the beautiful figure that God blessed you with. Live life to the fullest with a smile on your face, and be grateful for what you have. Always.
Heat oil in oven dish in a preheated oven on a high heat until very hot. Add sausages, reduce heat and bake for 20 minutes or until cooked thoroughly. Add batter and bake on a high heat for 20 minutes or until crispy.
Well....now I need surgery which of course is TREMENDOUSLY inconvenient & will no doubt put me out of action for a good long WHACK....BUGGER....!!!!!
Zach-"Mom, he turned off my playstation right in the middle of my game."
I've tried to ignore it for the past few months but March 1st is approaching and Blogger is doing away with Google Friend Connect. I'm not sure if that means I will lose all of my followers AND I will be lost to everyone too? There are some blogs I read on the daily and if I lost my link to all those, I would be sad faced.
When home alone
A Rumi quote here and there
I'm hung over
2 embodies
Cliff bar / Protein bar
Trinity Male Choir - Christians, Awake, Salute the Happy Morn 1922 FINAL (fixed)
"Their computers and office equipment have been repeatedly seized.
But there was a lot more to like this week: Kaoru may not be the strongest kid, but he isn’t going to sit back and let Sentaro do all his fighting (and rowing) for him. We like that beyond his wimpy looks, he’s got fire, and he won’t be cowed by bullies. We also like his interactions with Ritsuko. He seems to be falling for her quickly (he’s likely as inexperienced with women as jazz) but there’s a carefree beauty to their summer day in the sea that’s only blemished by the presence of Sentaro. By the episode’s end, the boy/girl ratio balances out at 2:2, which should console Kaoru. But we can’t help but think Ritsuko doesn’t quite feel the same way about him.
I make no bones about my perception of lacking maturity in my colleagues. Any frequent reader to my blog will attest to my clear repugnance for those who talk on their cell phones during class, or carry on a conversation with their neighbor during a lecture. To subject me to this "hand-holding" when I am 31 years old, however, is an insult to my intelligence.
Anwaar: You need a teacher in order to learn. You won’t be able to learn just from pieces of paper.
Details
No chance. The Americans are here to stay and as this becomes more obvious, so the first signs of resentment creep in. From the US point of view, they're going to have to work hard to stay in control and the best way to do that is to cash in on people's vulnerability and convince them they are still at risk and in need of 'saving'.
Me: Aw thank you
I am sad to report that the answer is a resounding NO.
LYB recognizes the work of card-makers out there and appreciates
Teaching Takes Trying
Come to Jesus
Anyway…Here are some photo’s from lovely India. I hope I can go again soon.
So inform yourself and as many people you can, in any way you can imagine. Decide to help improve our world and don’t stop until you’ve done it! Be it a small or a huge change, it’s always better than nothing. Importantly, don’t underestimate your power. Also keep in mind that trying and failing is a wiser approach than never trying.
I didn't eat. Well, I did eat but very minimal amounts. In fact, I remember from my childhood, I detested eating. It wasn't because I wanted to be skinny. I simply did NOT want to eat. Even to this day, IF I didn't have to eat I wouldn't. Yes, THAT is the truth. I eat to appease those who love me even now. I still don't like to eat.
Hubby: “You put it on hairy legs, put a paper on it, let it dry, then pull it off.”
Squeeze all your lemons and dump juice into a large serving bowl.
“Hayır, hayır,” he exclaimed when I held out a bill.
There, I feel better for having explained my views on the subject. Feel free to share your views in the comments.
Furniture into place.
Let me ask you this: can you really go wrong with a Saturday at a winery? You sure can't. I was invited with a group of new-ish friends to spend the afternoon at the Winery at La Grange in Haymarket, VA, a beautiful retreat from the hustle and bustle of the city. The winery sits atop of a sprawling hill overlooking the vineyards (and also some horses!). We started with a tasting inside the manor and then proceeded to camp out at a table on the patio for the rest of the afternoon with some peach/mango sangria and live music for Cinco de Mayo.
(Give someone credit for something and name it if you can).
Chalk pencils
We noted that Atos had not provided evidence to show that each year it processed over 1.2 million referrals for medical advice and completed over 800,000 face-to-face medical assessments, or that it had over 1700 healthcare professionals. We therefore considered that the claims had not been substantiated and concluded the ad was misleading.
Naturally, I was ecstatic. After all, we'd got nothing in for dinner, so at least we wouldn't have to fork out for a suspect take-away. I started pulling out the largest roasting dish from the back of the cupboard but SP stopped me.
Opportunity presented itself in North America and Dad made his move, securing a job in the design office of a project in Seattle, Washington. Mum & us kids (there were only two of us at that time) stayed in Vancouver until Dad could work something with U.S. Immigration and get us across the border.
We think of entrepreneurs as people who start companies from scratch, taking the risk to produce and sell a product or service and reaping the rewards. But there’s another type of entrepreneurial spirit, represented by people such as Suzzanne Uhland, who has blazed trails and experienced her own risks and rewards as a Partner of global law firm O’Melveny & Myers LLP. Based in San Francisco and Newport Beach, California, she earned recognition as an influential business leader in the Profiles in Diversity Journal’s 2010 Women Worth Watching issue. A member of the National Advisory Board of the Women in Law Empowerment Forum, Suzzanne Uhland also garnered a listing in Orange Coast magazine as one of Orange County’s best lawyers.
Burning burning burning burning
We have even eaten.... Mc Donald's.
281Come, if thou dar'st, all charming as thou art!
Phoenix continued to fight back, and after outscoring us by 5 in the 3rd, they would do the same in the 4th, but it was too little too late. We shot 53% for the game and 9 of 18 from three. Everyone got in on the action once again, as all 13 Spurs had double-figure minutes, and everyone scored. The dominating 105-91 WIN sealed the Spurs' Southwest Division Championship. But yeah - we've got much, much larger goals. My man Timmy was definitely the #1 factor for these two games. Already playing younger than his years, I believe he got a little wake-up call.. Thanks, Andrew Bynum! We'll see you Tuesday! Here's the boxscore..
The book was released on the very same day that the second underground city was destroyed. I do not believe this was consciously planned or intentional, but it is synchronistic.
We will be having exclusive sponsors so hop on over to our new challenge home and join in all the
I took three bracketed frames with 2 stops difference. The shutter-speed printed here is the slowest with +2 stops. It was such a bright day that I had no problem in pushing the aperture down to f/22. Tonemapping was done with Photomatix. Color saturation of the three yellow domes of the Imperium complex were increased manually in Aperture to pop up the color.
You long for the rewind button, even after many many instances of acceptance.
1) Trip was great, thanks for asking. We flew directly to Rome and spent two nights there, then three nights outside Siena, three nights in Cinque Terre, and two nights in Florence.
“Thank you? Your…piercings are cool?” Leonard suggested. Nikolas’ hand subconciously flew up to his ear, finger counting the three piercings on his right ear, which matched his left.
Robert A. Pritzker
Despite my musical snobbery at times, I'm a bugger for a Christmas album! I've got almost 100 of them - far too many to even play at Christmas in fact, yet I still can't leave it alone, and always end up buying a few more every year.
We are not quite there yet, but virtual machines always remind me of Star Trek’s Holodeck – a virtual world, where the OS thinks it runs on a real machine, but it can be “paused” at will and shelved away until a later date.
I ended up cutting mine 1" wide so I think the dimension is your call as long as you keep it the same for all the strips.
Assess: However, notice the young woman in the flip flops who winds up the ground observing and assessing the situation — several times, actually, as the first couple of action choices don’t appear to be working.
10. Magic Word
One of the best times of the year to experience this passion first-hand is during October when the annual Iceland Airwaves festival comes to town, squeezing bands into every available space – cafés, museums, small shops; last year FM Belfast even rocked up at a book store. “We feel that the bands
No question that the world we live in is not perfect ( such as GMO’s, factory farming, corporate dominance, the overuse of vaccinations – especially with our children, the way they raise and feed cattle which we are expected to eat, the crappy way that our government is run with corporate structure and interests calling most of the shots, and the proliferation of the environmental destruction going on before our very eyes, even tho citizens are protesting. . . you know, the usual stuff..) . . .we have our senators and congressmen we can deal with and of course, the voting booth. . . may not sound like much, but baby – - that’s POWER!
Liam – Lets see what the bank holiday brings. More research i suppose!
Don't forget that you can enter with ANY kind of crafty project!
The main conflict comes from the fact that Penny may forgive and understand Danny, but she doesn’t know if she will be able to forget. Every time they take a step closer towards solving the issue, she pictures him with the other woman. The complexity of the situation wasn’t glossed over and that’s why I found the story so interesting.
A quilter without this base, without this body of content and traffic will be hard pressed to compete with me without a significant marketing budget.
4. Modern Urban Fantasy
Again, use one of your darker shade colors (in this case, E27) to draw in your shadows. I actually added in to the tip of her boot to give her those "boxy" knee highs. It'll help to get some added depth to the image.
3. The nation of Panem.
Maybe the most famous centaur story is the one about Heracles and his wife Deianeira. The two arrive at the river Evenus, where the centaur Nessus has set himself up as the ferryman. Heracles boosts Deianeira onto Nessus’ back, but rather than taking her over the river, the centaur starts to run off with her. Heracles pulls out one of his hydra-poisoned arrows and shoots Nessus who, before dying, whispers to Deianeira his apologies and says that she should gather up a bit of his blood. Then, if she ever doubts her husband’s faithfulness, she can give him some of it, and it will make him love her again. Deianeira foolishly believes him and does indeed slip her husband some of the poisoned blood. Heracles dies in agony and Nessus, in death, has his revenge.
Attributes: Agility-d10, Smarts-d12, Spirit-d12, Strength-d10, Vigor-d10
“You just take your time,” Cely said.
Welcome to the Squigglefly Challenge Blog!
And yet this revolutionary socialist is casting aspersions at the EDL. An EDL which believes in parliamentary democracy. (Even if it is unhappy, like Churchill, with many aspects of the present system; it's still ‘the best out of a bad bunch’.)
“Slanting silver ropes slammed into loose earth, plowing it up like gunfire. The old house on the hill wore its steep, gabled roof pulled over its ears like a low hat…”
4 ) A Mind-Reading Headset
I am blessed to have a husband that reads my manuscripts thoroughly and finds all of those problems. But this time, in an epic failure of communication between my husband/editor and myself, we didn't catch these things before mailing off my story.
With new developments being made daily, paying attention to the trends is going to be crucial during this ‘Gilded Age’ for mobile marketing. Technology is on the rise for great things, generating devices that are allowing marketing to be more direct and personal than ever before. Your brand has a lot to gain from joining the mobile movement and implementing some of the trends mentioned above. As for the bigger picture, we can all take a hint from Generation C – the future of our industry – and get connected now.
Well-behaved Baekhyunnie: Since debut, Baekhyun who has shown his cute and well-behaved image, also has a silly side; besides suddenly blurting out a off-topic statement like bathing with another member that makes fans imaginations go crazy and scream non-stop, he also revealed that after showers, he often likes to practice different facial expressions in front of the mirror, so that he may prepare for advertisements. Additionally, the funny videos from pre-debut were also a hot topic among fans
Lots and lots of beer.
Don't quit, Discouraged Football Player. It is always the darkest just before dawn.
- Wifi is easy to access, no registration or other hoops to jump through
I think that the widow kept coming to the judge and wore him down till he gave in.
This past weekend I went to the north yorkshire coast of the UK and I walked along the beach enjoying the ozone and the sound of crashing waves just as I did as a child. It was really gratifying to see, in these days of computer games and mobile phones, children doing exactly the same as I did when I was their age. Running into the cold surf, splashing and laughing whilst their parents warn them of the dangers and to be careful.
Grandin does not merely describe, she thinks about what she has seen, she makes considered comparisons and analyses. It's apparent from this that Grandin was a progressive and forward-thinking woman. Her descriptions of American child-rearing practices, the schools she visited, the treatment and behavior of women, all show this. "This tendency toward social mobility is certainly one of the American virtues that I appreciate the most. Nothing is worse than for an intelligent person to be boxed in and limited. Nothing is worse than being stuck, as only a sense of powerlessness, silliness, and stupidity can come from caged rats."
Be brave, trust me, and enjoy!
and whatever I've dived into here is only going to get more complicated.'
We spent Saturday getting to know our new surroundings, doing some washing, visiting a Christmas market, and a couple of friends of the owner of the house dropped by to welcome us. We found out that the property was very new to the holiday rental market; they had only finished renovating it a couple of months ago, and we were the first people to rent it, which didn't come as a surprise to us.
Experience Golf With RL150 Remote Golf Trolley
Mike Piazza and Tom Glavine. You cannot get further on my love list than those two. I have never said a kind word about Tom Glavine and I never will. OK, Carlos Beltran. I avoided commenting on his cards now long enough. I want to like Carlos Beltran. Heck, I want to love him. I have a boatload of his cards. And yes, I know he had some good years for the team, but I am afraid in the long run, the best thing about Carlos Beltran for the Mets is he got us Zach Wheeler. Sad. The bottom row has a neat old Topps Gallery Players Private Issue card of Rey Ordonez. I now look back on Rey Ordonez fondly, so I guess there is hope for Carlos Beltran. I have that Dynasty card in a gold ultra-low numbered version, so having it in orange is nice too (the back has Keith Hernandez and Darryl Strawberry). That last card proves the old Meatloaf lyric correct: two outta three aint bad.
am I dictating what anyone should do with their lives, rather, I would
The manager’s haggard face and wild voice seemed to have flowed seamlessly from appealing to missing staff over the tannoy system to presiding over this lunatic ritual. The figures were chanting and Michal found himself retreating from them until they had all arrived at the self-service machines. The store manager gave a final deranged bellow, with such passion that Michal thought that the man’s heart would well up and drop out of his mouth.
July 26, 2011 — Judge Belvin Perry rules juror names will remain secret until October 2011, citing public “outrage and distress” over the not guilty verdict. He also appeals to Florida legislators to bar the release of juror’s names in some cases “in order to protect the safety and well-being of those citizens willing to serve.”
Then, Miss Jay takes them to a monastery where they receive a traditional Chinese astrological reading from . . . an iPad? “Master Chen” goes out on a limb and says that Alisha loves her mom, which turns her into a believer because, seriously, how could anyone possibly know that? His other predictions for the other girls are just as vague, but it obviously wasn’t meant to be taken seriously as, when it was over, the girls had to use makeup and clothes to “change their auras.” Then the astrologist turned into a fashion critic, complimenting the girls’ use of scarves and criticizing Catherine’s use of green lipstick. He picks Laura for the win (for no discernible reason), and she wins a spa package with the only other American left, Eboni.
Apparently, she did well at the movies....she ate popcorn, scarfed down "NandM's" (that's what she calls them), and intently watched Toy Story 3. But shortly over an hour into the movie, she turned to Steve and said,
“That’s nice, but I’m in Burbank!” ARGH!
one such “rash” decision: hugging mom. telling her how much you love her. that it’s going to be okay. i literally had to stop myself from doing this because i wasn’t sure if within an hours time that dark cloud would plop itself back over my head and start spewing unmanageable amounts of cold, wet rain all over me, making me regret hugs, causing me to want to retreat more deeply inside myself than i had before…
Jeff Hunt (REP) 13.12% 1,533
A knock at the door brings hard news for 16-year-old Ree Dolly. Her father has skipped bail on charges of running a meth lab, and if he doesn’t show for his next court date, the Dollys will lose their house.
She struggled against his grip, clawing at his hand.
-The wine in Balzackia Castle
Hope you all have a great week!!
OK, We have new items at the mall in both booths and will have more in by the weekend. Tommy has been wonderful taking care of me and working his full time job. I am blessed to have a truly amazing husband!!
There was even fear among the Malays then that the country was going to become a republic with the UMNO leader in charge during the tumult becoming the country’s first president. Thus, UMNO and Perkasa do not have to jolt the Malays into believing that the country would go republic if the Opposition took over.
This was sort of a light workout as I only did three exercises. That is because, I was completely out of fuel. I felt the running on empty syndrome after the first set of lat pull downs. That brings us back to last nights dinner.
This Defense has given up the NFC East's least amount of points. All the Giants' division foes have given up over 300 points thus far. The Giants have allowed 250 points. That's good for first in the division and fifth best in the Conference. Coach Perry Fewell and his Defense are gaining greater understanding of each other and the results are bearing that out. The Front Four have been getting sacks without the Giants having to blitz too often as Antrel Rolle and Terrell Thomas have been reaping the rewards in the secondary as a direct result with their roles easier to disguise.
Located outside of Bratislava, this farm grows and rears all their own stuff. We had lunch here own day and got to get real close to the farm animals. A herd of sheep followed me around for a little bit for some unknown reason.
Nxumalo has been charged with eight counts of attempted murder and one count of malicious damage to property. The matter was postponed to December 11.
To fulfill this contract, ZDS partnered with Tottori Sanyo's conduct to provide them. This is the first collaboration between a brand known for its OEM (Original Equipment Manufacture) from Asia. Furthermore, many well-known computer manufacturers who work closely with OEMs from Asia, like Compaq and Citizen. It also resulted in the growing OEMs in Asia, such as Chicon, Acer, Quanta, Compal, Twinhead, Sanyo, Tottori Sanyo, Citizen, and Casio.
Barked the rocker dog!
I do know, however, that whatever bloated, swollen, distorted and malevolent sense of self-importance has led us to believe we have a right to control the Earth and all her children...I do know that this sickness (or evilness) must stop. It must end, soon, and completely.
Washington 13, Dallas 7
Despite the fact that this is repeated over and over in the community. People seem to forget this in every story I READ. I swear, if I had a penny for everytime somebody pretended they understood this rule, yet never incorporated it into their writing.... This is really the #1 thing you can do to improve your writing. Lots of things fall into place if you understand this simple rule.
So the choice before voters is someone who will uphold Oregon law – or someone who makes campaign promises not to enforce the law in order to get votes. I don’t believe the AG gets to make unilateral decisions about which laws to enforce and not enforce. The voters and the legislature expect you to uphold all state laws.
The math portion of the packet include activities to support students as they learn to skip count by 2's and 5's , skip counting cards for the pocket chart, tallies, working with less than/greater than/and equal using the proper symbols, decomposing numbers, ordering objects by size, and more. There are even a few fun playdough mats included. Writing activities include arranging words to make complete sentences, writing to share facts about animals, whole and small group writing to make books, and more.
Apologies for the long delay, dearest Readers—I’ve been busy hobnobbing with some of India’s finest energy geeks and politicos. I’ve yet to fully digest the unevenly electrifying boluses they’ve slipped me, but here are some musings on what’s going well and what’s not.
Motorola mobile phones will be uncomplicated to handle and are typically lighting and straightforward to hold close to. The fashionable in addition to amazing variations now have manufactured him or her favorite among the teens exactly who desire to bring plus flaunt cool and trendy mobile phones accessible sold in the market.
Now for my creation. The stamp set I used is called Mustache Madness. It has so many fun sayings on it for masculine cards. I went with making a birthday card because I never seem to have enough guy cards hanging around. The mustache sure does ink up nicely.
When life feels like an upstream battle,
Heidi Montag and Spencer Pratt are broke and living with Spender's parents. They're making a movie about this called "The Hills have eyes and those eyes have tears."
Gayatri Chakravorty Spivak is University Professor at Columbia University and a trainer of elementary school teachers in West Bengal.
which is true, but the difference is that the beds are much more intense and way above the “safe” limits (no matter what they say). UV rays are known carcinogens, which means they are known to cause caner (just like cigs). In fact, indoor UV tanners are 74% more likely to develop melanoma (the super deadly kind) than those who have never tanned indoors. New research has shown that those who make just 4visits to a tanning salon per year increases their risk for melanoma by 11%, and their risk for the two most common forms of skin cancer, basal cell carcinoma and squamous cell carcinoma, by 15%. “Your risk of developing melanoma increases after just one blistering sunburn. Squamous cell cancer increases based on your lifetime exposure to UV rays. Basal cell carcinoma risk increases based on the combination of intense sun exposure and lifetime exposure to UV radiation.” (Thanks Dr. Oz) You get UV rays from both the bed and sun! Every time you burn your skin (or tan it) you’re damaging the cells’ DNA just ever so slightly, that eventually it’s just enough to cause the cells to mutate and voila! hello cancer.
A netizen said,”She used to have joo geok (rice scoop) chin. If she hadn’t undergo surgery to correct that joo geok chin, it will appear often. So she is a beauty that is made under the knives.”
Panizzi was energetic, hard-working, enthusiastic, and a really good hater. He knew he was right, and everyone else was wrong, from the idiots at the Royal Society who didn’t know enough Latin to catalogue their own library, and then wouldn’t pay him when he put it right for them, to the greedy and narrow-minded publishers who were reluctant to hand over the copies of new books to which the museum was entitled. He was in a state of almost constant warfare with his own colleagues at the museum, and his various advances in the hierarchy were vigorously resisted – a good starting point was usually his foreignness, though in fact he became a naturalised Briton in 1832 (which caused a breach with his fellow exile Mazzini). Interestingly, a number of the Museum’s staff since its foundation had been foreigners, including the Dutch Mathieu Maty, the Swiss Joseph Planta, the German Carl König, and the Swedish Daniel Solander (Banks’s friend, colleague and librarian), and none of these had chosen naturalisation. These precedents did not of course prevent meetings at which speakers expressed concern that Panizzi had been seen selling white mice on the streets of London; Fagan acidly notes that ‘had it been a few years later, possibly the distinctive title of organ-grinder would have been added’.
Formatting: Formatting is really easy because Scrivener has most of the standard manuscript formatting tools... I've been finding that this isn't the case with many other software programs. For example, some programs don't allow the use of "Tabs" or double spacing, which are essential for paragraphs in manuscripts!!
You receive employee complaints, do exit interviews with employees who leave, and know the reputation of your organisation in your industry. You watch the discussions on employee Intranets, manage the appraisal and 360-degree feedback process, and coach managers in appropriate staff treatment. This information will help you learn to identify the symptoms of negativity before its morale-busting consequences damage your workplace. It will also assist you in preventing and curing workplace negativity.
‘Yes, I know, but he’s all right now isn’t he?’
We had a farewell dinner at the hotel as this was the last night of our Western Wildflower Wonderland Tour. The next day we didn't have to be at the airport until midday so we took an early morning walk through the streets of Perth. It was a dull, cold day and difficult to get good shots.
Grandma Drake flew out to witness this event and we sure had a lot of fun with her.
A spokesman for the first minister said: “This meeting – which took place four years ago – was not included in the Scottish government’s previously published meetings due to a simple error, and will now be included in our updated proactive publication of meetings with proprietors, editors and media executives which will be published shortly.
The 1st Battalion was involved in some of the most fierce fighting of the Easter Rising. The first skirmish occurred on the afternoon of Monday 24 April, when Volunteers in the Four Courts engaged and defeated a party of Lancers (Cavalry) who were escorting trucks loaded with munitions. On Wednesday, the Volunteers captured two enemy positions in the area, the Bridewell which was held by police, and the Linenhall Barracks. Unfortunately, by Thursday the area was effectively cordoned off by the South Staffordshire and Sherwood Forest Regiments of the British Forces.
“…can they do other work, too?”
Roughly a half mile away, at another high point in the swamp, Pitcher, his mother and his sister went through a similar procedure. Heavy equipment was stashed. A map was consulted. Pitcher took a compass reading and the three set off toward the same point as Manny and Pappy.
I didn’t catch your name
Let us explain….
Love Froogs xxxxx
-Do you realize that every picture you post of your toddler shows him watching TV?
Part of these historic works has been rescued from near dereliction and is now open to the public.
"Come in, come in, come in!" he cheerily says, "This is gonna be fun!"
Thank you for the visit, happy stamping...
shirt — Carolyn Taylor (can't remember; it's older than dirt)
Glad of a point especially as we were down to ten men after Faye’s red card but we had a legitimate goal disallowed in extra time. Alan Wiley hang your head in shame or better still stop kowtowing to Man City. Pompey away next which should be interesting as the home fans are planning a protest against their owners or whoever they think are the club’s owners…
Hope you enjoy and are inspired to EMBOSS!
I’ve been thinking about the issue of weight loss recently and how it’s such a struggle for so many men and women worldwide. While working at a Philadelphia hospital, I’ve watched helplessly as so many individuals die prematurely from diseases caused by obesity.
Microsoft Security Essentials 4.0 free PC security software ready for download - Microsoft has released a new version of its Security Essentials software for Windows XP, Windows Vista and Windows 7 PCs.
My What's Brewing arrived on Friday. That's the newspaper of the Campaign for Real Ale. CAMRA to you and me. It was a good issue in my view and there was one article, by Ian Fozard, that caught my eye particularly. Ian has form at CAMRA AGMs - in a good way - and has a lot of both campaigning experience. As well as being a pub chain owner, he is now a brewery owner - he owns Roosters of Harrogate, so he has a foot in more than one camp. His article is wide ranging and sensible in the main. He calls for an awareness campaign of the difficulties of running pubs, a closer working relationship with organisations where we have common cause and a more relaxed attitude to craft beer. (Don't get too excited about the last one though, he doesn't think much of it and prefers just to let the market decide. But tellingly he isn't remotely agin it.)
As you can see Jim puts so much energy into his work...what a great character for him to play with..its almost bouncing off the walls..and that lower lip covering his nose in a huge sulk is so memorable!!!
i really am a terrible blogger. no mention of christmas at all, no photos of handmade gifts ( i made lots and i was to tired to take pictures...lame!) no year end review or new years resolutions, blah blah... but i do love sharing a good deal. here are some fab jamba juice coupons for you to print out. you are welcome. via here.
As pastor of senior adult ministries at South Henderson Pentecostal Holiness Church, it is my honor to have both a church and community outreach through ministry in local nursing and retirement homes.
Umno, MCA and MIC* = Initially the three major ruling parties represent ethnic Malay, Chinese and Indian respectively, forming Barisan National with other parties. Now Barisan National is the major political coalition in Malaysia.
With March and April being the busiest sowing months you’d expect there to be loads of seedlings growing on at the Two Chances Plot. And you wouldn’t be wrong. Here’s a few progress photos from the three growing areas; the greenhouse, cold frames and good old windowsill.
Melt down winter, budding spring
Hamburger Helper. I made this a lot in college for my husband. He finally banned me from making it because it's the definition of crappy food. The problem is, it's so easy to make and includes your meat, starch, and vegetable (you have to add that in though) all in one skillet! I think my husband finally drew the line when I made Hamburger Helper Fettuccine Alfredo and it turned into a paste after 5 minutes. I guess I don't blame him- it was pretty gross.
when he had washed their feet and put on his outer garments and resumed his place, he said to them, “do you understand what I have done to you? you call me Teacher and Lord, and you are right, for so i am. if i then, your Lord and Teacher, have washed your feet, you also ought to wash one another’s feet. for i have given you an example, that you also should do just as I have done to you. ~ john 13:1-15
A little different, but still a clean and simple card. What do you think?
I used Flourishes "Let's Have Tea" teapot and stamped a sentiment from "Lenten Rose" over it, then sponged in "Antique Linen" around the edges. I'm using Flourishes "Classic Ivory" cardstock and a piece of Basic Grey paper that I cut with a Tim Holtz Rosette die to create the scalloped rosette under the image. I used Spellbinders Scalloped and Classic Circles to cut out my image and give the base the scalloped circle shape.
Deploy service packages and BI applications from development environment to UAT / Stage & Prod environments.
the lashes rise
Jo James of Cart Before the Horse
One day you came home with char marks on your paws and steak on your breath. You had stolen the meat off someone’s grill while it was cooking. Your love of garbage was epic and unrequited. You habitually strewed the contents of bags and cans along our street. We were terrified the neighbors would discover your delinquent ways and shoot you. When you gorged yourself on chili from our garbage can we wanted to shoot you ourselves. Your floppy ears saved you many times.
The arrival of the BMW X1 to the US coincides with an update that includes exterior and interior refinements as well as a range of BMW EfficientDynamics technologies. All models feature Brake Energy Regeneration while the X1 sDrive28i and xDrive28i models also benefit from Auto Start/Stop and ECO PRO mode to further reduce fuel consumption.
Going into the fifth, Crolla came out looking for the knockout punch on Mathews. His head was clear and he was going all out for the win. The better work rate was coming from Crolla but Mathews was decisive in his attack. Anything Anthony had, Mathews blocked and then came back with an attack of his own – with pinpoint accuracy.
Links are used all over the web to connect one webpage to another. Links use a word, phrase, or image to connect you to another document. Knowing how to properly write a link is beneficial to bloggers because it allows you to:
On the flip side of this, there are a whole array of moments for which I tend to grossly underestimate the level of my influence on Pip and Polly. I was reminded of this recently when I took the kids to get passport photos.
As a self-described old indie-fart, are you still able to connect with the next generation of musicians, and more importantly, readers?
Naturally, all this pushing of Hall as a future superstar by the disposable utensils empire came to nought. Her TV specials (click here to see a clip from the 1972 show "Once Upon A Tour") clearly registered in the brains of quite a few confused Americans who promptly filed their childhood memories of her in the parts of their brains labelled 'kitsch', but failed to ignite her career in the manner expected. Still, the company carried on promoting her in one form or another until her death in May 1988, and there's something incredibly loyal and touching about her husband's devotion to her career.
I don't want to be in the hospital at all--even if for a short stay, but know that I will.
Those were my exact words nearly six years ago when my dad arrived early on a Sunday morning to help renovate my basement. And he really did look like shit. His face was white as a ghost. “I’m fine,” my dad replied, “just must’ve eaten something funny last night.”
Not this group.
Last week, I met with my attorney to talk about the brewery. Usually when I call him, it's for bad news. He was already for me to start giving him the story about what happened and how I needed him to help me out. He has heard about the new venture before. He was aware that I was setting up my own company. But he didn't see the term "Brewery" getting mixed into the conversation. Much to my surprise, he was excited. He was interested. He thought it was "cool idea". Great minds think alike, because I thought the same thing.
Clash - Bright turqoise with silver sparkle
My review of ‘The Meat and Wine Co.’
It is not fair to categorize this man as a Jew hater for accepting an award from an organization that represents his heritage. Doing so takes a play right out of the Democrats' playbook, which will play very well into their hands in 2012.Doing so, exposes a terrible hypocrisy and severely cripples the GOP's chances of presenting a united front against an out of control government.
The process whereby these mechanical motions begin to be turned into sound begins in the area known as the inner ear. In the inner ear is a spiral-shaped organ filled with a liquid. This organ is called the cochlea.
Will try my best get round later to your blogs if not I will def be round tomorrow.
Imprisonment is not enough for such offenders. Death is the only punishment fit for such crime and that too not an easy death like shot in the head or lethal injection. Its should be like that video somewhere in the Middle East where the offender was beheaded in Public.
Mame's 3 Beekman Place duplex was a study in design contrasts as art director Malcolm Bert and set decorator George James Hopkins set the plot story lines with six types of decor -- Chinese, Danish Modern, East Indian, English, Chinese and twenties modern (with a nod to decorator Syrie Maugham). The Danish Modern decor was perhaps the most fun with sofas, chairs and tables that could be elevated for comic relief. The sets were glamorous, often over the top (the Oscar Academy must have thought so too as the film was nominated for Best Art Direction that year) and plan on hitting the pause button and taking notes throughout.
Gillespie said the additional focus on African Americans by Obama and his reelection campaign is necessary. The sag in “strongly favorable” ratings is an important measure of intensity as the 2012 campaign approaches.
Frankly, I’ve never heard this person sincerely apologizing to me. I don’t even know if she’s aware that she has done something wrong to people or just playing fool about it, or does she even realize that she’s doing too much? On our Physics class later, she bullied me again like pulling my ponytail impudently and I did not violently react about it. I kept cool but I can’t help giving her the a**hole sign because she was too much. Even if I frown in front her, she ridiculously continues, as if the other person still seems okay while the truth is, he/she already gets upset at some point. She’s always superficial like that, that is why my bond with her never progresses. She is hardly coated with gaudiness but she can’t open up from within. I know we’ve almost been together for two years but I’ve always wondered why our string doesn’t step up to next level. I’ve seen many flaws about her and most of her unpleasant traits that stink. Every once in a while, I understand that she can be able to create fragrance to our friendship but there’s not a single time that she’d bring it again to stench. It’s like a backward-forward relationship with people. But then again, I have my own flaws so I don’t deserve reiterating hers because a hypocrite might have been killed by the time I finish this entry. I just wanted to point out the trait she has shown to me, to us, that made the last happenings build up a tension.
When we first got Luke, we were warned that German Shepherds were territorial around their homes, the cars that they routinely rode in, and their food. Luke never lived up (or should I say down) to any of those labels. Labels are dangerous things. They don’t have to be at all true for our subconscious minds to accept them (especially when we are very young) and then we tend to live them out. I’ve met brilliant people who believed that they were only marginally intelligent, thin women who believed that they were fat, responsible people who believed they were untrustworthy….and the examples could go on and on. We’ve all met “them”: people who believed lies about who they really were, and so were destined to live out these smaller existences, constrained only by a false idea.
Heat oven to 400 degrees. Arrange cubed vegetables and pear in a single layer on a baking sheet and sprinkle with the oil. Bake for 20 minutes or until golden and tender. Remove to a bowl, toss with the chives and the vinaigrette. Serve at room temperature or chilled.
We are collectively sharing the communitarian plague of an unnatural and inhumane state of being. We are cursed to live in interesting times. But these times are so outside the realm of rational consciousness that our suppressed sense of common decency and logic create mental illnesses and even imaginary personalities simply to cope with our wrongness of being. And not unlike a zookeeper’s tiger who paces back and forth in his confined cage behind metal bars in his own constant mental anguish, we humans long internally for something we know exists but just cannot attain – our natural habitat.
Mel X
Unless you are an LGBTQ person, you don’t know what it’s like. You have no idea what it’s like to always have that nagging feeling that nobody else views you as “normal”. I am pretty lucky – for the most part, my friends, family and coworkers accept my sexuality. But there are always people outside of my little safe bubble. There are always the weird looks, the awkward conversations, the blatant hate. It happens.
4. Um, none of them – including Israel – are in Europe. Small point, but worth bringing up I feel.
The Spaniard Berreo's initial attempt for the Golden City had been disastrously cut short; but he was still determined to find it. Ralegh was determined to find it first. He had sent out a reconnaisance party late in the previous year under his 'most honest and valiant' Captain, Jacob Whiddon. It had never reached the mainland, for some of them were hospitably invited ashore at Trinidad by Berreo, and then murdered in cold blood. As England and Spain were still openly at war, he doubtless felt his treachery a justifiable hint to the English that they were not welcome.
Aaah. Internets, there is something just so indescribably glorious about sitting on a beach-facing balcony on a clear August night, punctuated by the odd early Perseid meteor, with a few excellent friends and a vast (and frankly shocking) amount of alcohol at one's disposal. I just love it.
Oh well i want to do lots of fun stuff with them,which i need to finish planning,i also got them books to keep their minds working ..........Summer Bridge...........this book is fun to do and comes for different grade levels and helps them review what they learned the past year and also introduces them to the grade they will be entering.They will also be visiting the library weekly and reading as much as possible.
This was the most mentioned song, although my own fave is “Number of the Beast”. I’m representing the choices of the people here! Great band. West Ham fans – this is a good thing!
Four years has made a big difference.
The rules and selection process
Streeter is a really peculiar first name. I just had to throw that out there. I was fascinated by the way he handles people. He knows how to get people to want to work with him, instead of feeling like they are being pressured by his position to work for him. He is manipulative in the subtlest of ways.
Me: Huh???
I made the mistake of watching IT when I was around five years old. My bus stop was at a corner with a sewage drain that steamed every. single. morning. and I swear to you after seeing this movie I thought for sure I’d be hearing someone from below me asking if I wanted my toy boat back.
Also, I've been thinking about style. I have no idea what mine is, but after today's Make it Monday attempts (note:plural), I've come to the conclusion that graphic it is not. Although it was a practice in failing.Stinkin' glitter. Lehrer says that the most creative people have learned how to fail early so they can fix it. For the longest time, I've been trying to get stuff right the first time, thinking that was the most efficient way.
24. Pittsburgh Steelers LB Vontaze Burfict (ASU) I am not sure what affected the Steelers more always having Rothlesberger playing with injuries or something on Defense just not clicking when it needed to. The Steelers add an excellent prospect with a serious attitude.
1 - If you have no idea what to say either write out the whole speech or a few points you want to make sure your say.
3. They don’t trust Romney to do away with Crony Capitalism as he says he will do (and as he did as much as he could with limited power in Massachusetts). Why doesn’t Reason believe him…because he supported the financial bailout. Which is kind of dumb. Yes TARP was a horribly conceived and horribly executed program…but to do nothing as libertarians seem to suggest would have been equally stupid. For years government conspired to force the financial sector to give out all those crappy loans (and yes they did force and threaten them with criminal and civil lawsuits if they didn’t give them out) so while the financial sector is not exactly saintly and has more than enough blame to go around on its own, the government is equally at fault. But the libertarians argue that after you’ve stabbed someone in the kidney it’s their responsibility to heal themselves. Huh? Yes TARP should have been drastically smaller and shorter, it should have been more targeted and not an industry wide panacea, it should have probably been designed to cure the shock waver after one of the major banks went belly up to prevent a panic not preventing them all from failing, but you know what, not doing anything would have been as bad if not worse. And yes Bush, Congress and the Fed deserve a lot of blame for not doing a more limited plan, but that does not mean an outsider who had no say at any level of the decision making process should take the blame for supporting what may be the lesser of two evils. So I can’t fully hit Romney for being pragmatic and saying, yes we need TARP.
Said, and blew a smoke ring. "You opt for fate."
Beefeater 24 was previously launched to rave reviews and is making waves with bartenders and consumers in New York, San Francisco, Los Angeles, Boston and Philadelphia.
8 -
On eight of 13 questions about politics, Republicans outscored Democrats by an average of 18 percentage points, according to a new Pew survey titled “Partisan Differences in Knowledge.”
juice of 2 lemons, limes or small sweet oranges, optional and depending on outcome of taste
Anyhoo, I was sort of gah-gah about him becuase he was freakin' gorgeous and sexy and flirty. Dumb as a brick, but still... But my friend knew him from her hometown. She knew what a dick he was and how he treated girls like shit. She warned me and then warned me again, and then when I refused to heed her warnings, she was pretty much like, "Well, okay. Your funeral."
~ Jean Waggoner
Our two horizontal air flow condensing unit product lines are now available with Tecumseh hermetic compressors in High, Medium and Low temperature applications using R407C and R404A refrigerants. Capacity ranges from 1/2 to 6Hp offer a complete product line up.
Lots of Interesting Meetings this week! On Thursday night I met Stan Brown in Halifax.Me & Phil The Ex-Fireman & Stanley were all in the same class at school 45 years ago! This was our first meeting in all that time!Stan is wearing-well!
Well, to be fair, he needs a cake for his party. And who doesn't have a cake on their actual birthday? Then there should be cupcakes at preschool... and you can't forget early intervention...
Ok, so sure, they come together easily, they are sugar-free, but do they taste good? Ask my son who refuses to eat apricots or coconut but devoured 2 of these squares while still warm. As these also support my own personal clean-eating plan I had to indulge too. Yum! They have a great chewy consistency, are not overly sweet and the flavors of both the apricot and the coconut come through in leaps and bounds. I especially love their crunchy, golden edges. These would be fantastic topped with some cream cheese too. Lastly, they are perfect any time of day, especially mid-afternoon with a lovely cuppa Earl Grey but would even be a super breakfast treat.
Every once in a while, however, the little out of the way meets attract enough athletes looking for an extra meet, or a tune up prior to a “big” meet, to get some pretty good results. Such was the case yesterday, as the little town of Lignano Sabiaddoro in Italy, as American women did a number in the 800 meters. To be honest I had never even heard of the town until I was scanning through results earlier today. And even then nothing was really striking as I scanned through.
1 3/4 cup water
But today my REAL pondering is to give credit to MY mom, without whom, I wouldn't have had a strong enough personality to see the way things usually were and assert that it wasn't for me. She raised me wanting me to have choices. She urged me to get a good education so I COULD stay home, but I could have a good job, instead if I wanted—so I didn't have to be dependent on somebody else--because you never knew what would happen. Never mind that now it really TAKES two incomes... I managed—I've been my family's primary wage-earner ALWAYS. I like what I do and while I'm not making remotely GREAT money, it isn't bad. It is almost enough my husband doesn't need to work.
Roc
Anyhow, here are the workshop details! :D
"snowy landscape"
Bake 20 mins. or until chicken is thoroughly cooked.
Same to this blog which some may perceived as BN biased and supporting the government as most of my criticism are towards Pakatan, there are critics to the Barisan and the government. My latest post has proven this. I am actually waiting for more of this move, to balance our dirty and shameful political phenomenon, and perhaps one day I will be the one. *wink.
If you hope to live in a bustling community with traditional historic roots, look no further than the Little Italy district in the heart of downtown San Diego. Condos in downtown San Diego, California are sophisticated, urban, and in high demand.
Oh, a darling little granddaughter! I’m so pleased Guinevere has finally given my son a baby… to think we all believed her childless, when all the time her little girl was hidden away in Avalon with Lord Avallach and his wild fairies. I don’t care if she’s a girl rather than a boy as everyone hoped. She’ll make someone a lovely queen one day.
Some great times was to be had throughout the weekend as we caught up with some old friends and met some new ones. If the TNA wrestlers were on a grading system for their treatment of the fans I would have to give them an impressive A+. Some could complain that the lines took a lot of time to get through but one of the big reasons was the wrestlers were so friendly and took the time to meet the fans. Making the experience that much more enjoyable.
seems to capture the spirit of these
The Landgericht maintained the injunction against Samsung Electronics GmbH, a German company, confirming the prohibition of selling the Samsung Galaxy Tab 10.1 in the EU, and in particular, the prohibition of producing, offering for sale, commercializing, importing, exporting, or storing the product for these purposes.
Hearing the words "head for the mountains" brings back awkward college memories of swilling cheap Busch beer in college back in the 80's. Thankfully in our more enlightened times, heading for California's Sierra Mountains won't lead you to a skunky brew, but the fine beers of Mammoth Brewing.
"Well, quite.", I agreed. We shook hands and he left. I noticed his muffin is only half eaten. Much like Hari's interviews are only half original, I thought to myself while smiling, self satisfied.
I have one at work tucked out of sight. I sit in a line of partially-divided, open-on-one-side cubicles, so my desk is at most 8-10 feet from the guy who sits across from me (as you can kind of see in the picture). Then there are two coworkers on either side of me (separated by those 5 ft high cube dividers), and then another coworker kiddie-corner from me.
The signature of ACTA by European countries does not mean the deal is done, needs to be ratified by the European Parliament.
1844, Japan. In the last decades of the Shogun and before the reforms of the Meiji era there is a moment of fragile peace. Unfortunately this peace will be shattered with the promotion of the Shogun’s half-brother, the depraved and psychopathic Lord Naritsugu (Inagaki Goro) who uses his status to commit acts of depravity and evil against the people of Japan. In an effort to preserve order, high ranking official Sir Doi calls upon noble samurai Shinzaemon Shimada (Yakusho Koji) to carry out an assassination. Waiting for Naritsugu to leave Edo with his personal army, Shinzaemon recruits twelve others to carry out a daring ambush in a remote village.
Vivian Casalduc, 45, New York, N.Y.
Obadiah turned 1 on Thursday. On Thursdays Mitch always stays late after school to work, then goes to play basketball at the high school and doesn't come home until 9 pm. I didn't want to interfere with his "normal" schedule, so we decided to celebrate Obi's birthday on Friday night instead. As it turns out, I still didn't manage to write a blog post on Obi's birthday. :)
Before I get to my creation, I probably should tell you a little bit about the BBB Challenge!
I have the same trouble with Mr Young’s car, which is one of those silver four-wheel drives that populate carparks everywhere. Many’s the time I’ve waited patiently by the passenger door of our car, only to have him call crossly at me from three rows away.
i love me some chevron. such a simple design but the playful V shapes make me so happy. the stacking bracelets shown are by a brand called TOMTOM that i recently stumble upon. i am more interested in this ring, but these bracelets are fun as well.
As I waited for my friend in the car, I could see, across some waste ground and half-hidden by a tree, an ambulance parked by the pavement in Creek Road, which runs parallel to the road where I was parked. The ambulance was facing the wrong way and a couple of paramedics were kneeling down at the pavement behind the ambulance, apparently tending to someone. I could see no other vehicles and no police car, so I figured someone had fallen down or had a heart attack.
Landing on an easter weekend along with other things going on has me grateful we jammed in some fun and leisure before now. I think sometimes the best gift of all is just to be kind to yourself on an everyday basis.
Previously these groups had carried out a ‘coffin protest’ against Lim’s political secretary and Komtar assemblyman Ng Wei Aik.
“Organizations are offering training for everyone, and in recruiting, there’s not a focus on any particular group; they’re looking for people who have the right skills and experience,” he says
Their menu:
This year I decided to jump on the clip-chart band-wagon. I also love this behavior management system but it's just a little overwhelming to try and do clips and coins. Sooooo in a desperate teacher moment I created the "penny fairy". Just so you know I really try to make a habit of not all out lying to my kids. I've gotten very creative at dodging the "Is Santa real?" question. Anyhow- so the penny fairy visits our classroom at night when all the kids are gone and drops pennies into the jars of kids who she's seen doing a good job during the day. I told the kids that sometimes us teachers get so busy teaching and doing stuff that we just don't see all the good things that kiddos do. So the penny fairy comes at night to reward kids that didn't get to clip-up or get pennies for making such good choices. Okay- I know a little crazy but boy is it working like a charm! Of course I'm getting paid back for my little deception now. Every time my kiddos find a pieces of trash or a misplaced crayon they proclaim it a "clue" to finding the penny fairy. I've caught a few of them huddled in the bathroom investing a promising lead. =) Haha- I guess I asked for that.
“In December 2010, the Communist Party Central Committee’s Public Security Commission issued a secret document to target China’s ‘house churches’ in implementing its special suppression campaign ‘Operation Deterrence,’ ” explained a China Aid report. “Government officials of all levels were told to ‘guide’ Christians attending those unregistered churches to worship in government-approved Three-Self churches, and to ‘break up’ large churches like Shouwang Church into small groups.”
I've already talked about how much money you can save by switching to cloth diapers even with a start up cost of $500. But many people make the switch to cloth without spending near that much!
1. I love love love the snow!
Anyway, I wasn't sure I was going to make it. I nearly called in sick to work on Friday (and to show you how crappy I felt, I have called in sick ONCE in close to three years at my job. Yep.) and I figured if I felt awful Saturday, I'd just have to skip it. Luckily, it started at 10 am which gave me enough time to sleep in (because 8 am is sleeping in! I am so old!) and I felt pretty good on race morning. Mucus-filled, but capable of running a moderately-paced 3.1.
One of our local Homeschool Bands Joyful Noise from Marrietta, Ga performed on the Capitol steps. It was great. They had a Jazz Ensemble, Symphony Orchestra, Recorder band(younger children), and Chorus. We flooded the capitol it was so many of us but as always with the homeschool crowd everyone was polite and orderly.
When I am hungry like this I swallow my spit a lot. Swallow, swallow swallow. As a child I thought I didn't need to work in school to get a good job cos you didn't need money, really:
I am choosing right now as I write to think positive, be productive and be thankful for life.
As I learned more about the passing... a father of two young girls, lost in a farming accident...I found my heart heavier. I admittedly hadn't seen his face in years. But it still just dug too deep. Perhaps partially out of selfishness. Because any loss makes mortality a reality. And for a moment, it makes you question everything. Perhaps because I envisioned the pain that he must have incurred. And it feels so unbalanced for such a good person, who's lived such a authentic life to endure such tremendous pain. But mostly because I ached for those two young girls. And for his wife. And for his sister. Brother. Parents. It's a scenario that feels too real. Because I know the faces of the people affected. And I know the goodness in their hearts. And it just feels unfair.
Malika Zarrar: What did he say?
I don't think I'd be capable of doing this. Definitely not with the book I'm currently working on and the other ideas I have also seem too drenched in character history to pull off something like what SOA does. But one day, dammit. It will be a goal.
The Dean & his prebendaries shall preach the word of God diligently, not only in the cathedral church where they live, but in other churches also of the same Diocese, and especially in the same places whence they receive yearly revenues and profits. Which if they do not, they shall be punished according to the discretion of the bishop.
The Morning Advertiser reports that, in response to the duty cut on beers of 2.8% and below from 1 October, local brewer J. W. Lees are launching two new 2.8% keg beers, a lager called Golden Lite and a smooth beer called Greengate Lite. This reflects what I have said before, that insofar as this measure has any effect, it will be in the keg and canned beer sectors. The weaker a cask beer is, the shorter its shelf life once the cask is broached, and I simply can’t see 2.8% real ales having sufficient turnover. So much for the “People’s Pint”.
Sometimes the simplest things really are the best. These cookies certainly prove that point. I first made them out of sheer laziness. I was preparing to make a plain cheesecake when I realized I was out of graham crackers. Not wanting to make a run to the grocery store, because that would entail changing out of my pajamas, I began searching for a simple cookie recipe that could serve as a graham cracker stand-in. I had previously used store-bought shortbread in the crust of a strawberry cheesecake with good results, so that seemed like a good place to start looking. After a bit of searching, I stumbled across a recipe that fit my needs: it was quick, it was easy, and I already had all the ingredients on hand. Perfect.
Kisses
Darwin claimed that all living species attained their present complex structures by undergoing small, gradual changes. According to his imaginary claim, an extremely lengthy evolutionary process must have taken place, and primitive and half-developed transitional life forms must once have existed in the past.
Today is my errand day and I made a stop at Target to pick up some groceries. As I passed by the baking aisle, I decided to pick up the ingredients to make brownies...just to treat the kids. Then, when I was waiting in line at the register I saw the woman in front of me had the Ninjago DVD the kids have been wanting in her cart...so I made a detour over to the video section. As I whipped up the brownies, I looked over at the kitchen table and saw the new DVD there. My heart skipped a beat at how excited the kids were going to be when they came home to TWO special treats waiting for them. Anticipating their excitement at my gifts for them brought me the purest form of delight. And in that joy, I heard a still small voice whisper to my heart, "Do you think your happiness brings me any less joy than you feel when your children are happy? Do you not think that I want to give you gifts just because I love you?"
Get a piece of paper (just DO IT). Now ask yourself: what can I change right now to my daily life that I can keep up for the next three weeks? And what can I add to that in three weeks? What about three weeks later? Feel free to tweak the 3 month outline above.
My sister Monica has a submission too, look for it tomorrow.
Peeled, washed and cut the sweet potatoes into cubes. Add into your washed white rice. Add chicken stock (homemade or store-bought) according to your rice cooker direction. Turn it on to cook. I used 2 purple sweet potatoes, 1/2 sweet potato and 3 cups white rice.
For my readers, I’d love to hear from you about what you have found has helped you? I love getting comments and feedback, but don’t often get the opportunity. I’ve been very remiss at keeping consistent blog posts happening, but hope to get to know how you’re coping, whether you are or not, what you’ve found to be a helpful support page or organization, what it is that would help you?
I'd walk through fire to retrieve it,
“Love is the voice under all silences, the hope which has no opposite in fear; the strength so strong mere force is feebleness: the truth more first than sun, more last than star...
If your searchin’ brings you
Regardless, the erroneous claim has become the keystone of a widening campaign to demonise plastic bags.
But why did we need a kidnapping of two little brats that Albert gets involved in? Wasn't their enough drama with the cabbies being threatened by Emerald Cab's gleaming fleet of taxis and clean-pressed jerks behind the wheel, gloating with their every appearance? What about the occasional appearance of cabbie union president Mr. Bravo (José Pérez)? What about the disappearance of some concert violinist's prize violin and its subsequent search with promise of reward? See what I mean about too much plot? Movies like this aren't about plots and dramatic turns of events; they're about seeing how the slobs end up turning the tables on the jerks and making their insouciance and laziness an integral part of their life AND their eventual outcome on top of the situation.
"Well, honey, I can't slow down for you. You just got to keep up! Where's the girl I used to know? You seem so despondent lately."
All this rambling and why do I feel like I could go on and on… need to say even more? What’s been going through my head? It’s a mental ailment with associated physical symptoms. (I still cannot believe that I have the balls to throw this out there for the world to judge.) This social butterfly has become infected now, with social anxiety. Go figure. I’ll never understand why, life as I know it is pretty damn good right now. I am blessed and fully aware that there are many unfortunate souls out there who have it much worse yet, have the strength of an army to carry on. I really don’t know how one does it under tragic or monumental circumstances. May our God bless all those with special intentions and needs. Thank you all so much for “listening”, I don’t expect you to understand, I just really needed to let go of this.
Enjoy the rest of your weekend and we look forward to seeing your crafty work!
I have an AMAZING review and giveaway to share with you today! Chelsea of Diamonds, Dog Tags & Diapers is a mark. rep and has sent me 4 items to review and will send the same 4 items to one lucky reader of Many Waters!
"Oh, good shot -but you opened your right eye at the last moment..." he shook his head.
I always like to go to different places (it's just natural human curiosity I guess) so I was more than happy that this weekend I could try a couple of pubs & places that were new to me in Mid/West-Lothian (Currie & Balerno) and then follow this with a new beer festival, being organised by Livingston Cricket Club and brought to my attention on Twitter by James Davies from the very new Alechemy Brewing (beer people are great!).
I have two for you this time.
When you reach the end of the West House Trail turn left on the dirt road and walk the short distance to the spillway that lies between Lake Jeannette and Lake Townsend. The spillway is perhaps 30 to 40 yards in length. It features a rickety bridge, a steady flow of water and a waterfall through a final dam at the lower end. Compared to the other spillways in the area, this one is larger and feels more remote and untended.
Along with the football tournament, the swimming event was the big winner of the 1924 Olympics. Importantly, the Piscine des Tourelles was the only venue that was specially built for the games, a revolutionary pool that was the first to limit the basin to 50m rather than the previously accepted 100m length for Olympic events, and with room for 10,000 spectators.
I’m always open to constructive criticism if you see mistakes or ways to improve upon what I’ve done. This is a learning exercise for me. However, not everyone feels that way, so if you don’t see an invitation to critique on their post, don’t do it. A lot of people just want and need encouragement!
For many years I wanted a miniature silver mug to place on a highchair that I have.
I received this book to review from Tor/Forge.
11. The explanation (and a rather clear and cogent one) of why defending states' rights is not a defense of slavery. p. 75 (also see this video)
Grandma Whacker gambolling about, trying to fly a kite. What is she like? It was lunchtime and I was calling all children to the table and there she is, still outside playing. She really is most wayward and Sets a Very Bad Example. She never got the memo that Grandmas should sit quietly inside reading an old copy of the Radio Times while having a little drop of sherry.
South Africa was uniquely singled out for criticism. Not a word was said about the enslavement of the Pygmies in the Central African republics, yet the public yelled “Apartheid!” every time an Afrikaner showed up at an international event. The Chinese occupation of Tibet concerned no one, but the South African treatment of nonwhites –who enjoyed freedoms Tibetans could never dream of, either then or now– was severely chastised.
Poor Beale and poor Buss.
More than a catchy headline or modern design, a story’s image (if it has one at all) is its hook for me. Have a captivating picture, and I’ll read your story.
as the Alchemist kneels, like prayer, and gasps
Writing has always been my therapy, and over the last few years, as I have slowly been broken, I turned my back on it. I didn’t want to fix myself. I’m ready. I suppose we should start at the beginning.
‘“Tell the Doctor”, ok, I get it,’ he said to the screen. ‘Go-chill-take-a-pill, I’m on it.’ Ollie started to rehearse the message ‘dead banana’ and turned away from the screen just in time to see his mother and the Doctor consulting a battered old book. It looked like the one he’d seen on her dresser once, and she’d locked it away after that.
While that seems an awfully cynical viewpoint, based on what I have learned about content farming, I have to admit that I understand where one would be moved to make such a comparison.
Network Attached Storage Seagate BlackArmor 8 TB NAS 440 Network Attached Storage Server, Brand SeagateNetwork Attached Storage ServerMicro-hard-drives8TB BlackArmor NAS 440, 32 CACHEPortable Hard Drive Carry Case
Once the application is approved, any surcharge suspensions will be cleared on the applicant’s driving record within three business days. Applicants will be mailed a notice with the reduced amount to pay and the due date. Payment of the reduced amount and other fees that are owed must be received within 180 days from the date of the notice. If payment of the reduced amount is not received by the due date, the suspension of driving privileges will be reinstated. However, the reduced amount will still apply until it is paid in full.
The first 2 years will be spent in the start-up stage, and road racing. ( I would
I'm just really happy today. Because now these people will leave me alone for two years. No more phone calls on my cell phone... no more TEXT MESSAGES telling me who to vote for (please tell me someone else got text messages...I got THREE of them!). No more annoying politician jingles. I just have to get through the rest of the day. And cross my fingers.
EdVest also offers many convenient ways to contibute:
here's a list of "generic" things to do:
project and after two weeks have decided that I really,
No, folks, those were child’s play. From 2004 to 2008 we experienced the biggest commodities bubble the world had ever seen. If you looked to the top 25 traded commodities, you found prices had doubled over the period. For the top 8, the price inflation was much more spectacular. As I wrote “According to an analysis by market strategist Frank Veneroso, over the course of the 20th century, there were only 13 instances in which the price of a single commodity rose by 500 percent or more. For example, the price of sugar rose 641 percent in 1920, and in the same year, the price of cotton rose 538 percent. In 1947, there was a commodities boom across three commodities: pork bellies (1,053 percent), soybean oil (797 percent), and soybeans (558 percent). During the Hunt brothers episode, in 1980, silver prices were driven up by 3,813 percent. (A crack up boom)
These small distillers are changing the rules. Grappa, in their hands, is no longer the byproduct, no longer a desperate attempt to squeeze the last dimes out of a harvest, but a goal in itself. What’s more, small, artisinal distillers are allowed to do anything they want. Basil eau de vie? Sure. Organic asian pears? Why not?
Towards the end of the chapter, they run into Whip Jeters, a park ranger who has known Ava and her family for a long time. He's surprised to find her with the Bird Man, but Ava and the Bird Man convince Whip that they're cousins.
Senator Andrew
My house is tiny. Each room about 10 x 12 feet. Each wall lined with bins full of our hobbies – paints, papers, musical instruments, tools, computer parts, random odd gadgets, books, toys,etc. Each room has a walkable path from doorway to doorway, no other clear space. It’s not like hoarding, we actually use all of the various items, and we are all terrible at organizing them once we use them and just throw things towards the bins as we fly out the door. And the piles don’t reach the ceiling, just a few bins stacked up. So it is bad – but nothing like you see on TLC.
The girl decides to take something out of her purse,opens its zip,rummages through the chaos,and takes out her cellphone.With the sleek,shining phone in her dainty hand,she suddenly turns towards him.He is taken aback and prepares himself for an explanation or apology,swallowing a lump.But she flashes a benign smile and presses the digits on the keypad several times in a swift,cyclical movement of her manicured nails.I watch him loosen up and smile again tentatively,like a child testing the patience of his parents.
That’s the opinion of Earl G. Graves Sr., the founder and publisher of Black Enterprise and one of this year’s inductees into the Advertising Hall of Fame.
The obvious question that arises from this kind of cosmology is whether God makes people do evil, which is a concept that Islamic theologians struggled with for centuries, and, as far as I am aware, never really came up with an entirely acceptable answer for. I can’t think of any Islamic theologian who actually said that God makes people do evil (although to my memory Abu ‘Isa, who wrote in the tenth century and was posthumously declared a dualist came close – that probably contributed to why he was called a dualist), but it’s certainly a question that arises in a lot of Islamic theological works.
Hail Victory (Metal Merchant 1995 - limited to 1000 copies)
Instead, one objection to the term is that it just seems a bit definitive. After all, if there was a ‘glass ceiling’ we’d have no women or people from black or ethnic minority backgrounds in senior management; and whilst we don’t have enough there are definitely some.
1/2 cup peanut butter
Couple of glugs of olive oil
Amanda xx
And so, like every intern or poorly paid employee who seeks to recoup that lost value, (a feat usually accomplished with stolen office supplies) I set out to recoup what I felt I was owed. But, this being an arts and culture paper where all sorts of bands, artists and film-makers submit press-packs for review, I was afforded the chance to make up for all that I endured and then some, when I found, and stole this photo:
My first reaction is to be very angry. Because HSSH should be the one calling him once a week.
In fact, the introduction of “racism” might sometimes introduce a complicating factor. Stabbing someone constitutes violent physical discrimination in any case. The automatic assumption of “racism” can easily be a false trail. So while offensive language might be a useful guide as to whether a crime was racially motivated, it should, in my opinion, be seen as one of a number of factors, to be corroborated before any final conclusion can be drawn.
Venetia Williams began training in 1995 and her first part-season produced a respectable seven winners. Things really took off the following campaign when her score went up to 33. In 1997/8 there were 45 winners from her yard at King’s Caple in Herefordshire and the following two seasons Williams sent out
